<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89623-0006 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-23-89.f2.A1005</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK BOARD</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 509 and 512</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[No. 89-1586]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3068-AA64</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Rules of Practice and Procedure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="44">Date: June 14, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (``Board'') is amending12 CFR Parts 509 and 512, respectively, its regulations governing the rulesof practice and procedure in adjudicatory proceedings and investigativeand formal examination proceedings. The revisions to Part 509 are designedto streamline prehearing procedures with a view toward expediting the proceedings,to clarify the authority of Administrative Law Judges appointed to conductthe proceedings, and to add several new provisions. The revisions to Part512, which are of a clarifying and technical nature, update several provisionsof the rules relating to the conduct of investigative and formal examinationproceedings.The Board expects that legislation pending before Congress will, if enacted,affect these rules directly by expanding the types of administrative proceedingsavailable to the agency and making the Board's successor subject to newstatutory enforcement provisions. However, these anticipated changes donot affect the need for the substantive amendments made by this final rule.Therefore, the Board has determined to adopt this rule and, if necessary,later to amend Parts 509 and/or 512 to reflect changes in names, statutorycitations, and other procedural corrections that may be necessitated bythe statutory amendments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>June 14, 1989. These rules will apply to all adjudicatoryproceedings in which the notice initiating the proceeding is issued afterJune 23, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Gary A. Gegenheimer, Senior Attorney,Office of Enforcement (202) 906-7170; or Rosemary Stewart, Director, Officeof Enforcement, (202) 906-7622.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On October 17, 1988, the Board publishedfor comment in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>proposed revisions to its Rules of Practice andProcedures that govern adjudicatory proceedings authorized by the NationalHousing Act of 1934, 12 U.S.C. 1730 (``NHA''), the Home Owners' Loan Actof 1933, 12 U.S.C. 1464 (``HOLA''), the Change in Savings and Loan ControlAct, 12 U.S.C. 1730(q) (the ``Control Act''), and the Savings and LoanHolding Company Act, 12 U.S.C. 1730a (the ``Holding Company Act''). 53FR 40432 (October 17, 1988). These proposed revisions contained provisionsrevising prehearing procedures with a view toward streamlining adjudicatoryproceedings and eliminating the need for unnecessary proof, clarifyingthe authority of Administrative Law Judges designated to conduct such proceedings,clarifying when depositions may be taken in connection with adjudicatoryproceedings, and instituting a new procedure for summary disposition whereno genuine issue of material fact exist. In addition, the Board proposedcertain technical amendments to its Rules for Investigative Proceedingsand Formal Examination Proceedings. <T3>Id.</T3>After further consideration, including review of comments received on theproposal, the Board has decided to adopt the revisions substantially asproposed.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Revisions To Part 509</ITAG>Part 509 was originally promulgated in 1967, following the enactment ofthe Financial Institutions Supervisory Act of 1966, Pub. L. No. 89-695,80 Stat. 1028 (``FISA''). 32 FR 6764 (May 3, 1967); 32 FR 8889 (June 22,1967). The FISA granted the Board and its fellow financial institutionregulatory agencies the authority to issue cease-and-desist orders againstfinancial institutions and removal/prohibition orders against managementofficials who were found to have engaged in conduct that provided the groundsfor such actions as set out in the FISA.Subsequently, following the enactment of the Financial Institutions Regulatoryand Interest Rate Control Act of 1978, Pub. L. No. 95-630, 92 Stat. 3641,which amended the Board's enforcement authority in several significantways, Part 509 was amended in 1979 with minor revisions. 44 FR 62479 (October31, 1979). Thus, with minor changes, the rules have remained essentiallyunchanged since 1967.In the 22 years that Part 509 has been in existence, the number and complexityof the adjudicatory proceedings initiated by the Board have increased significantly.Particularly since the enactment of the Garn-St Germain Depository InstitutionsAct of 1982, Pub. L. No. 97-320, 96 Stat. 1469, enforcement actions involvingcomplex loan and investment transactions involving tens of millions ofdollars, have become the rule rather than the exception. At the same time,conversions from mutual to stock form of ownership, increasing activitiesof insured institutions in the securities area, and heightened interestin acquisitions of control of insured institutions have increased the possibilitiesfor adjudicatory proceedings under the Control and the Holding CompanyActs, as well as the provisions of the federal securities laws to whichinsured institutions and related persons are subject. While, as in thepast, most adjudicatory proceedings are settled prior to the hearing stage,the number of litigated proceedings is steadily increasing. Because ofthe increasing complexity of most of these cases, the Board believes thatit is appropriate to revise Part 509 to reflect the altered character ofthe cases and to streamline and clarify the procedures as much as possible.The Board notes that the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (``FDIC''),which has similar enforcement authority with respect to federally insuredbanks, recently adopted extensive revisions to its own rules of practiceand procedure. See 53 FR 51656 (December 22, 1988). The Board's staff hasbeen in contact with the FDIC staff about our common interests in revisingand updating the hearing procedures for both agencies. Many of the revisionsbeing adopted by the Board today closely resemble the rules adopted bythe FDIC. The principal changes that are being adopted are summarized below.A. Comment SummaryThe Board received one comment letter on its October 1988 proposal. Inaddition, the Board staff obtained and reviewed the comment letters filedwith the FDIC regarding its own proposal to revise its hearing rules. Ingeneral, the comments favored the undertakings of the Board and the FDICin substantially revising the rules applicable to adjudicatory proceedings.The comments also raised certain questions and objections, some of whichoverlapped. The issues addressed by the comments, including the commentson the FDIC's proposal that also pertain to the Board's proposal, are incorporatedinto the discussion below.B. Specific Items Raised and Suggested Changes(1) Several of the commenters on the FDIC's proposal suggested that Rule403 of the Federal Rules of Evidence (``FRE'') should be incorporated intothe agency's rules of procedure. FRE Rule 403 permits the exclusion ofevidence where its probative value is outweighed by other factors, suchas the undue consumption of time. The rationale for this suggestion wasthat rules of evidence utilized by the agency, which track the languageof the Administrative Procedure Act governing admissibility, did not providesufficient guidance to Administrative Law Judges on the admissibility ofevidence.(2) Objections were raised to permitting depositions solely in instanceswhere witnesses would be unavailable to testify at the hearing.(3) One commenter on the FDIC's proposal questioned the process of filingexceptions to recommended decisions as being archaic and cumbersome. Thiscommenter suggested, as an alternative, that briefs be utilized settingout a statement of facts and reference to the record.(4) Some commenters on the FDIC's proposal suggested that the decisionof the Administrative Law Judge should be treated as an initial decisionof the agency, which would become final unless appealed to and reversedby the FDIC's Board of Directors, instead of being considered a recommendeddecision requiring a final decision by the agency.(5) With respect to subpoenas, it was suggested by one commenter on theFDIC's proposal that subpoenas be standardized into a simple format andpre-printed. It was also suggested that subpoenas be pre-signed by an authorizedofficial and issued by the Office of the Executive Secretary (the FDIC'sequivalent to the Board's Secretariat). The rationale for the pre-signingsuggestion was that the role of the Administrative Law Judge should belimited to ruling on disputes concerning subpoenas. The same commenteralso recommended that when an issue was raised as to whether top agencyofficials could be subject to subpoena by respondents, the AdministrativeLaw Judge should determine in the first instance whether the subpoena couldbe issued. The commenter opined that this procedure would prevent abuseof process by respondents who unnecessarily sought to subpoena senior agencyofficials.(6) One commenter suggested that the FDIC's proposal to prohibit any material<T3>ex parte</T3> communications was overly broad and that a provisionprohibiting only <T3>ex parte</T3> communications pertaining to the merits of the proceedingat issue would be sufficient. On the other hand, the commenter on the Board'sproposal argued that the proposal did not go far enough, suggesting thatall <T3>ex parte</T3> contacts should be prohibited and that the ``housekeeping''matters such as scheduling of prehearing conferences be handled by a ``hearingclerk'' designated by the agency. The commenter on the proposed rule suggestedthat, while consultations between counsel for the parties and the administrativelaw judge on administrative matters may appear to be innocuous, clevercounsel on either side may be able to utilize such opportunities to ``sensitize''the Administrative Law Judge to certain factors favorable to their theoryof the case. In order to avoid this possibility, the commenter recommendedthat all such administrative matters be handled by a clerk who would notbe in a position to render a final disposition of the proceeding. In addition,the Board's comment letter took issue with the proposal's provision thatcounsel for the Office of Enforcement may advise the Board with regardto proposed rules or other legal proceedings involving analogous factualor legal issues. The commenter suggested that if the Board or AdministrativeLaw Judge needs guidance with respect to case law or legal precedent inan attempt to resolve an issue under consideration, it would be more appropriateto have counsel for both sides submit briefs specifying what the properlegal treatment of that issue should be.(7) A commenter on the FDIC's proposal opined that the provision for summarysuspension of attorneys by the Administrative Law Judge for contemptuousconduct may be too harsh and recommended an interlocutory appeal processas a means of ameliorating this situation.(8) Several of the FDIC's comment letters questioned whether respondentsshould be provided with a ``Wells'' type submission process, similar tothat employed by the Securities and Exchange Commission. Two commentersrecommended that the FDIC implement such a process, while one opposed it.The comment letter to the Board did not address this issue.(9) The commenter on the Board's proposal suggested that the Board, alongwith the banking regulatory agencies, attempt to obtain a ``pool'' of administrativelaw judges that have had some exposure to or experience in Federal bankinglaw. This suggestion was based on the experience of the Board and the bankingagencies in obtaining the services of judges from other agencies with widelydifferent backgrounds and experience, resulting in the possibility of inconsistentdecisions on substantially similar facts and circumstances. The commentertherefore suggested that a provision be incorporated into the Board's rulesto provide for more uniformity in the selection of administrative law judges.(10) The Board's comment letter recommended that the provision regardingoral argument before the Board, which would require that parties requestingoral argument show good cause why their arguments were not, or could notbe, presented adequately in writing, be eliminated. The commenter believedthat this proposal would discourage oral argument, which in turn, the commenterbelieved, is inconsistent with fundamental fairness.(11) Finally, the Board's comment letter suggested that a provision beadded permitting the filing of <T3>amicus curiae</T3> briefs in enforcement proceedings. The commenteropined that such submissions can provide additional legal expertise andfurther elucidate issues that the Administrative Law Judge or the Boardmay fail to fully appreciate.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Comments and Modifications</ITAG>(1) The Board believes that the present version of andSection;509.24, whichcontains the standard for admissibility of evidence set forth in the AdministrativeProcedure Act, provides sufficient guidance to Administrative Law Judgeson this issue. Therefore, the Board does not believe that it is necessaryto adopt language from Rule 403 of the Federal Rules of Evidence on thismatter.(2) Regarding the suggestion that depositions be permitted in more circumstancesthan set forth under the proposal, the Board disagrees. First, there isno general right to pretrial discovery in administrative proceedings. See,e.g., <T3>Silverman</T3> v. <T3>Commodity Futures Trading Commission,</T3> 549 F.2d 28, 33 (7th Cir.1977); <T3>NLRB </T3>v.<T3> Interboro Contractors, Inc., </T3>432 F.2d 854, 858 (2d Cir. 1970);4 Stein, Mitchell, andamp; Mezines, Administrative Law andSection; 23.01[1]at 23-7 (1987) and cases cited therein. Second, one of the principal purposesof the revisions to Part 509 is to streamline and shorten the proceedings.This is consistent with both the language and legislative history of theNHA and the HOLA, which generally require that hearings be commenced 30to 60 days following the issuance of a Notice. See S. Rep. No. 1482, 89thCong., 2d Sess., reprinted in 1966 U.S. Code Cong. and Admin. News 3532,3537. The deposition process for general discovery purposes (as opposedto preserving testimony where the witness will be unavailable to testifyat the hearing) would be inconsistent with this statutory mandate. Accordingly,the Board has elected to retain the provision allowing for depositionsonly upon satisfaction of the prerequisites set forth in the rule. TheFDIC reached the same conclusion on this issue. See 53 FR 51658. The Boardis, however, adopting a provision permitting limited document discoveryin certain circumstances.(3) Section 557(c) of the Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C. 557(c),specifically authorizes parties to adjudicatory proceedings to have a reasonableopportunity to file exceptions with administrative law judges. This procedurehas been utilized for many years at many administrative agencies. Whilethe commenter opined that the exception process was archaic, burdensome,and time consuming, the Board believes that this procedure assures theparties that a fair, just, and detailed review of the record and of therecommended decision will be undertaken. Under the rules, exceptions generallyare to be filed within 30 days of service of the recommended decision,so that lengthy delays should not occur. Accordingly, the Board believesthat it is appropriate to continue to utilize the exception process setforth in the Administrative Procedure Act. The FDIC reached the same conclusionon this issue. See 53 FR at 51658.(4) The Administrative Procedure Act provides that the individual who presidesat a hearing may issue an initial decision or a recommended decision. Thedifference between the two types of decisions is that an initial decisionbecomes the final agency decision unless one of the parties appeals thedecision to the agency or unless the agency undertakes to review the initialdecision on its own. A recommended decision, on the other hand, does notbecome a final agency action unless the agency specifically adopts therecommended decision, requiring some formal action by the agency in everyadjudicated case.The Board has determined to maintain the present two-tier approach to itsadministrative enforcement proceedings of a recommended decision of theAdministrative Law Judge followed by a review and final decision and orderby the Board. The Board believes that this approach provides the partiesto such proceedings with due process protections by providing a reviewof the findings, conclusions, admissions of evidence, and any other rulingsmade by the Administrative Law Judge. Additionally, the Board believesthat it is unlikely that many parties who had been willing to proceed throughthe hearing process would fail to appeal an adverse initial decision tothe Board. Thus, the change suggested by the commenter does not appearlikely to expedite the entry of final agency decisions in most proceedings.The FDIC reached the same conclusion. See 53 FR at 51659.(5) Regarding subpoenas, the Board notes that it already utilizes a standardpreprinted subpoena form in connection with its adjudicatory proceedings.The suggestion that an authorized official of the Secretariat execute andissue subpoenas, however, would not be practical under the present system,in which Administrative Law Judges must be ``borrowed'' from other agencies.Accordingly, the Board has determined to maintain the existing practiceof having subpoenas issued by the Administrative Law Judge upon applicationby any party.(6) Although the Board is sensitive to the concerns of the commenter inthe area of <T3>ex parte</T3> communications and believes that the suggestion regardingdesignation of an administrative clerk has some appeal, it also does notbelieve that such a suggestion is practical given the present structureof the adjudicatory apparatus. The problem stems principally from the factthat all administrative law judges utilized in the Board's adjudicatoryproceedings are employed by other agencies, and the level of support staffsavailable at those agencies differs considerably. Unlike Federal districtcourt judges, many administrative law judges do not have law clerks tohandle routine matters. Furthermore, because the administrative law judgeshandling the Board's proceedings are disbursed in agency offices throughoutthe country, it would not be practical to designate clerks at the Boardto handle such matters. Accordingly, the Board has decided to adopt therule as proposed. The Board does encourage parties to adjudicatory proceedingsto utilize the services of administrative law judge's clerks or supportstaff to handle routine matters whenever possible.Regarding the proposal's language that counsel for the Office of Enforcementis permitted to advise the Board on settlement proposals and on other unrelatedlegal proceedings, the Board believes that the commenter apparently misunderstoodboth the language and intent of the proposal in this area. The Board doesnot intend_and does not believe that the language of the rule contemplates_thatcounsel for the Office of Enforcement should advise the Board on mattersregarding an adjudicatory proceeding under consideration by the Board excepton notice to all other parties to the proceeding and opportunity for otherparties to be heard. Rather, it is the Board's view that OE counsel shouldhave the freedom to advise the Board on other matters, such as the adoptionof proposed regulations or other enforcement proceedings (such as injunctiveactions in Federal district court to which the Board may be a party) thatmay arguably involve similar factual or legal issues without running afoulof the <T3>ex parte</T3> rule. Obviously, if the administrative law judge or theBoard needs legal guidance in a particular adjudicatory proceeding, theproper procedure is for the parties to make their views known to the Boardin accordance with the rules. The Board does not believe that the limitedprovision allowing OE counsel to advise the Board on other arguably analagousmatters in any way compromises the general rule.(7) Regarding suspension of attorneys from particular proceedings, theBoard notes that the relevant case law has consistently upheld the authorityof administrative agencies to set standards for admission to practice beforethem as well as to establish criteria for suspension, debarment or othersanctions for misconduct. The provisions of Part 509 on this issue, aswell as the provisions of Part 513, include sufficient due process protectionsincluding notice, an opportunity for a hearing and a right of review. TheBoard believes that these provisions will contribute to a fair, expeditious,and just resolution of enforcement proceedings and, accordingly, has decidedto adopt them as proposed. The FDIC reached the same conclusion on thisissue. See 53 FR at 51659.(8) There has been much discussion recently concerning whether a formalor informal procedure, such as the SEC's ``Wells'' procedure should beimplemented to permit potential respondents in enforcement actions to havean opportunity to persuade the agency that official enforcement actionagainst them is not warranted before any action is actually taken. Onestudy, a report commissioned by the Administrative Conference of the UnitedStates, while making no formal recommendation regarding the adoption ofany such procedure for the banking agencies, did note that such a procedurewould be of limited utility in the process of bank supervision and enforcement.The rationale for this position is that the supervisory apparatus alreadyprovides numerous informal opportunities for the exchanges of views inthe normal course of the examination and supervisory process before a formalenforcement action is commenced. <T3>See</T3> Malloy, <T3>Report to the Administrative Conference of the United States on AdjudicationPractices and Procedures of the Federal Bank Regulatory Agencies </T3>(1987)at 53, n. 197. The Board is in agreement with this position. The informalmechanisms already in place for resolving regulatory problems (<T3>i.e.,</T3> the opportunity to consent voluntarily to a resolution ofsupervisory concerns by entering into consent orders or otherwise) normallyprovide potential respondents with an opportunity for presenting theirpositions, while at the same time allowing the agency to move swiftly andefficiently to correct problems discovered during examinations of insuredinstitutions. Accordingly, the Board has determined that it will not adopta formal or informal Wells-type submission procedure. The FDIC reachedan identical conclusion. See 53 FR 51659.(9) The Board believes that while it would be desirable, through the useof a ``pooling'' arrangement with the other banking agencies or otherwise,to endeavor to ensure more uniformity in the selection of administrativelaw judges, that goal cannot adequately be addressed in this document.The Board must necessarily rely on the availability of administrative lawjudges at any given time and, unfortunately, has no control over whetherthe available judges will have significant expertise in banking matters.In order to remedy the possible problem of inconsistent decisions on similarfactual and legal issues, the Board has sought, through the publicationof these rules, to provide as much guidance as possible to administrativelaw judges (while allowing them sufficient flexibility to deal with uniqueor unusual circumstances that may arise). The Board does look forward toworking with the other banking regulatory agencies to address the perceivedconcern raised by the commenter.(10) After careful consideration, the Board has decided to retain the provisionregarding oral argument as proposed. The Board believes that there is ampleopportunity for the parties to make their views known through the submissionof written materials, briefs, live testimony of witnesses, and, in manycases, oral argument before the Administrative Law Judge. In those casesin which one party's views could not have been adequately presented inwriting prior to the final decision stage, the rules provide a means forscheduling oral argument. The Board believes that this provides sufficientprotection for all parties and that a presumption in favor of grantingoral argument would therefore be cumbersome and unnecessary.(11) The Board has decided not to adopt the commenter's suggestion regardinglimited participation and the submission of <T3>amicus</T3> briefs. In the Board's view, if a significant number oflimited participants were to raise collateral issues in administrativeenforcement proceedings, the proceedings may become unmanageable and tootime-consuming. The Board also notes that the presumption in enforcementproceedings is, and for many years has been, that they will remain privateand confidential unless the Board determines otherwise in the public interest;permitting participation by other parties, even on a limited basis shortof full intervention, could seriously undermine this presumption. Accordingly,the Board has decided not to include a provision allowing limited participation.<ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Summary and Discussion</ITAG>A. Subpart A: General<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Appointment of Administrative Law Judges</ITAG>Unlike the majority of federal departments and agencies that conduct adjudicatoryproceedings, the federal banking regulatory agencies (including the Board)do not have their own administrative law judges on their staffs. As a result,the Board must request that the Office of Personnel Management (``OPM'')arrange for other agencies or departments to ``loan'' the services of theiradministrative law judges to conduct adjudicatory proceedings on a case-by-casebasis. OPM selects administrative law judges for these proceedings on acase-by-case basis from a ``pool'' of available candidates. Section 509.3codifies the existing procedure. In this regard, the former definitionof ``presiding officer,'' which meant alternatively the Board or any personactually conducting a proceeding, is being eliminated. Under the revisionsadopted today, the term ``Administrative Law Judge'' is specifically definedto mean an administrative law judge appointed or detailed as specifiedin Title 5 of the United States Code to conduct an adjudicatory proceeding.The term also refers to the Board where an administrative law judge hasnot yet been appointed, where his services have ended, or where he is otherwiseunavailable.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Appearance and Practice in Adjudicatory Proceedings</ITAG>Section 509.5, concerning appearance and practice in adjudicatory proceedings,makes several changes to the prior andSection; 509.3. First, any appearanceby an attorney or duly authorized official of a corporation, partnership,or government unit is subject to the provisions governing conflicts ofinterest, as well as those concerning suspension and debarment (Part 513).Second, andSection; 509.5(a)(2) provides that any person who is a memberin good standing of the bar of the highest court of any State, possession,territory, Commonwealth, or the District of Columbia and who has not beensuspended or debarred from practice before the Board in accordance withthe provisions of Part 513 and has not been excluded or suspended froma particular proceeding pursuant to andSection; 509.5(c) may represent partiesin that proceeding. The attorney is required to file a notice of appearanceat the outset of the proceeding, stating that he is qualified to representothers in accordance with andSection; 509.5(a)(2) and disclosing whetherhe has ever been suspended or debarred from practice by the bar of anyState, territory, Commonwealth or the District of Columbia, and, if so,the dates of such suspensions or disbarments and a description of the surroundingfacts and circumstances.The new disclosure requirement represents a change from the proposed rulein this area in that under the proposal, an attorney who had been suspendedor debarred in any State or other political entity listed in the rule wouldhave been automatically precluded from representing parties in an adjudicatoryproceeding before the Board, irrespective of the possibility that he mayhave been a member in good standing of some other bar. Upon reconsiderationof this issue, the Board has decided to retain the language of the existingrule while adding a disclosure requirement regarding any suspensions ordisbarments to which an attorney is subject. Such suspensions or disbarmentsmay, in appropriate cases, be grounds for commencement of separate proceedingsunder Part 513.Section 509.5(d) also provides for representation of non-parties appearingto give testimony at depositions by their own attorneys.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Good Faith Certification</ITAG>Rule 11 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure provides the basis forandSection; 509.6, the ``good faith certification.'' This is a new provision.Like Rule 11, the proposed rule requires that every written presentationmade by a party after the issuance of the notice must be signed by thatparty or the attorney for the party. A signature on a post-notice writtenpresentation constitutes a certification that the attorney or party hasread the written presentation, that the presentation is well grounded infact and warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for extendingor modifying existing law, and that it is not interposed for any improperpurpose to the best of that party's or attorney's knowledge, information,and belief formed after reasonable inquiry. Failure to sign a written presentationwill result in its being stricken from the record unless it is signed promptlyafter the signature omission is brought to the attention of the attorneyor party. The making of an oral motion or argument constitutes the samecertification as the signing of a written presentation. The AdministrativeLaw Judge or the Board has the authority to impose sanctions under Part509 or under Part 513 upon the attorney, the party, or both, for violationsof the good faith certification requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. </ITAG><T3>Ex parte</T3> CommunicationsSection 509.7 is new, but it embodies existing law in the area of <T3>ex parte</T3> communications. It defines, generally prohibits, andprovides for sanctions in the event of improper <T3>ex parte</T3> communications. Paragraph (a) of the rule defines an``ex parte communication'' as any material oral or written communicationconcerning the merits of a proceeding, which takes place between a party,his counsel, or any other person interested in the proceeding and the AdministrativeLaw Judge, the Board, any member of the Board, or any person assistingor advising the Board concerning the preparation of a decision with respectto the proceeding and which was neither on the record nor on reasonablenotice to all parties. It prohibits <T3>ex parte</T3> communications from the time the notice is served (or,if a party learns that the notice has been approved by the Board, fromthe time that information is acquired) until the Board serves its finaldecision. Paragraph (d) prohibits the Administrative Law Judge from consultingwith anyone within the Board on the merits of an adjudicatory proceedingexcept on reasonable notice and opportunity for all parties to participate,and provides that the Administrative Law Judge shall not be responsibleto or subject to the supervision or direction of any officer, employee,or agent of the Board engaged in the performance of investigatory or adjudicatoryfunctions in connection with an adjudicatory proceeding.Paragraph (c) of the rule sets forth a procedure to be followed in theevent that an <T3>ex parte</T3> communication is received by the Administrative Law Judge,a Board Member, or other person described in paragraph (a). If the communicationis in writing, the person receiving the communication will be requiredto cause a copy of the communication to be served on every party to theproceeding. If the communication is oral, a memorandum setting forth thesubstance of the communication must be served on each party. All partieswill then have 10 days to file with the Administrative Law Judge or theBoard a response to the <T3>ex parte</T3> communication, including any recommendation for sanctionsthey believed to be appropriate under the circumstances. Sanctions maybe imposed for knowing violations of the rule. Such knowing violationsmay be grounds for a decision adverse to the party violating the rule orsuspension or debarment of the person engaging in such conduct under theprocedures set forth in Part 513.Communications between the Administrative Law Judge and parties or theircounsel involving routine non-substantive matters such as scheduling ofconferences or meetings, requests for copies of documents, or brief extensionsof time are not considered to be communications concerning the merits ofthe proceeding and are not considered to be within the scope of the rule.In addition, the rule does not preclude counsel for the Office of Enforcementfrom advising the Board on settlement proposals submitted pursuant to andSection;509.22, or on matters (such as proposed regulations or other legal proceedings)that involve analogous factual or legal issues but are not related to theproceeding at issue.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Maintenance of the Record, Service, Filing of Papers, and Copies</ITAG>``Housekeeping'' matters concerning maintenance of the record, service,and filing of papers are covered in andSection;andSection; 509.8, 509.9, 509.10,and 509.11. Section 509.8 provides that the Board's Office of the Secretary(``Secretariat'') shall maintain the official record in each proceeding.Section 509.9 amends the prior provision governing service by the partiesto clarify that service is deemed to have been accomplished at the timeof personal service, upon deposit in the United States mail of the documentor paper required to be served or by delivery of the document or paperto an express mail delivery service. The revised rule thus adopts the provisionof Rule 5(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure that service by mailis complete upon mailing. The rule also reduces the number of copies ofpapers that must be filed in adjudicatory proceedings and clarifies therequirements as to filing of papers with the Secretariat. Under andSection;509.10, the original and one copy of all papers required to be served onother parties to the proceeding will be filed with the Secretariat at thetime of service or within a reasonable time thereafter, but no event laterthan 3 business days following service on the other parties. A copy mustalso be served on the Administrative Law Judge at the time of service onthe other parties.The prior rule provided that materials required to be filed with the Secretariatbe received by the office in Washington, DC on or before the applicablefiling deadline. This could lead to a situation in which a party wouldbe required to send materials to the Secretariat prior to the time he wasrequired to serve the opposing parties in order to ensure that the Secretariatwould receive the materials by the appointed date. In order to rectifythis situation, the Board has adopted a system similar to that employedunder Rule 5(d) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, pursuant to whichmaterials may be filed before service or within a reasonable time thereafter.The prior rules also were potentially confusing in that the rule governingmotions, former andSection; 509.10, provided that once a presiding officerwas appointed, all motions were ``filed'' with the presiding officer. Moreover,while andSection; 509.19 required that seven copies accompany the originalof any document required to be filed with the Secretariat, this requirementwas not applicable after a presiding officer was appointed and prior tothe filing of exceptions to the recommended decision, because all motionsand other papers were filed with the presiding officer. The former rulesdid not specify any number of copies that must accompany originals filedwith presiding officers, and the practice of Administrative Law Judgeson this point may vary considerably. The Board believes that, while theAdministrative Law Judge must necessarily receive copies of all motionsand other significant papers filed in connection with a proceeding, theproper custodian of the official record in an adjudicatory proceeding shouldbe the Board's Secretariat, not the Administrative Law Judge. The Boardbelieves that the rules adopted today will eliminate any uncertainty byproviding that the Secretariat will maintain the official record and willreceive the original and one copy of all filings (functioning, in essence,in a manner analogous to a ``clerk of the court'') and that a copy of allsuch filings will be furnished to the Administrative Law Judge. This isconsistent with the procedure recently adopted by the FDIC governing filingof papers and maintenance of the official record. The rule does not applyto the transcript of testimony or exhibits adduced at the hearing or toproposed exhibits submitted to the Administrative Law Judge prior to ahearing in accordance with a prehearing order issued pursuant to andSection;509.21.<ITAG tagnum="81">6. Amending Pleadings</ITAG>The Board is adopting a procedure, similar to that utilized by other administrativeagencies, that permits the notice and answer to be amended by leave ofthe Administrative Law Judge or by the express or implied consent of theparties without formal amendment. Previously, a notice could be amendedonly by the Board, and there were no formal procedures for amending ananswer. The Board is making this change in order to reduce further thenumber of routine matters upon which it is required to rule prior to afinal disposition of a proceeding. The change is not intended to constitutea substantive departure from the former andSection; 509.4, under which mattersof fact and law alleged in a notice could be amended at any stage of theproceedings. Accordingly, the Board is including language similar to thatemployed under Rule 15 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, which mandatesthat leave to amend pleadings shall be freely given where justice so requires.This amendment is virtually identical to the rule governing amendmentsof pleadings recently adopted by the FDIC. 12 CFR 308.22, 53 FR at 51674.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Consolidation and Severance</ITAG>Section 509.16, concerning consolidation and severance of proceedings,is entirely new and closely resembles the FDIC's amendments on these issues.12 CFR 308.24, 53 FR 51674. Section 509.16(a) addresses circumstances thatmay arise when more than one action is taken that arise out of the sametransaction or occurrence and involve common questions of law or fact andwhen a proceeding is instituted seeking the same remedy against two ormore respondents based on the same transaction or occurrence. In thesecircumstances, proceedings generally should be consolidated unless it wouldcause undue delay or manifest injustice.Section 509.16(b) provides that a proceeding involving two or more respondentsmay be severed on the motion of any party or upon the initiative of theAdministrative Law Judge or by resolution of the Board. Severance may beappropriate if the proceeding against one or more of the respondents isbeing settled or stayed, if severance may promote prompt resolution ofthe proceedings, or if severance would be required to prevent manifestinjustice.<ITAG tagnum="81">8. Interlocutory Review</ITAG>Section 509.18 is a new provision that permits parties to a proceedingto appeal rulings on motions by the Administrative Law Judge only in verylimited circumstances. Interlocutory appeals are permitted only in extraordinarycircumstances that warrant the Board's prompt review. Any party desiringto appeal a ruling of the Administrative Law Judge on an interlocutorybasis will be required to submit a motion to the Administrative Law Judgerequesting certification to the Board for interlocutory review. Exceptionswill be available in cases of rulings by the Administrative Law Judge suspendingan attorney from further participation in a particular proceeding or denyinga motion for summary disposition. Upon certification by the AdministrativeLaw Judge, notice of a denial of a request for certification that a partybelieves was clearly erroneous, or notice of a ruling that may be appealedwithout certification, a party may file with the Secretariat a petitionfor interlocutory review of the contested ruling. The petition must includea copy of the order from which interlocutory appeal was being sought anda statement of the factual and legal bases for interlocutory review. Anyparty will be permitted to serve a response to a petition for review within10 days of service of the petition. The Board will determine whether togrant the petition and will decide the issue without oral argument or furtherwritten submissions unless it otherwise orders. Unless otherwise orderedby the Administrative Law Judge or the Board, no motion for certification,petition for review, or granting thereof will operate as a stay of theproceedings. Any stay of longer than 30 days requires specific Board approval.The Administrative Law Judge may certify a ruling to the Board only uponthe motion of a party and a determination by him that the ruling involvesa controlling question of law or policy as to which substantial groundsexist for a difference of opinion and that an immediate appeal from theruling may materially advance the ultimate conclusion of the proceeding.These criteria are modeled upon Rule 5 of the Federal Rules of AppellateProcedure, which concerns interlocutory appeals by permission pursuantto 28 U.S.C. 1292(b). The Board has the authority to dismiss an interlocutoryappeal if it determines that the Administrative Law Judge's certificationwas erroneously granted or that prompt consideration of the appeal wasnot warranted under the above criteria.<ITAG tagnum="81">9. Prehearing Procedures</ITAG>A number of new provisions are being added with the aim of simplifyingproceedings by narrowing factual and legal issues to be determined, resolvingas many factual issues as possible prior to commencement of the hearing,and providing for the exchange of information by the parties in advanceof the hearing so that only disputes regarding genuine, material, factual,or legal issues need to be resolved through the hearing process. In thisregard, the new rules contain provisions for the exchange of lists of witnessesexpected to testify at the hearing together with a summary of each witness'expected testimony prior to the proceeding, copies of all exhibits thateach party intends to introduce as evidence at the hearing, and stipulationsas to factual matters. In addition, any party may serve (and the AdministrativeLaw Judge may require all parties to serve) a prehearing brief outliningthe applicable legal principles and what the party believes the evidencewill demonstrate. The new procedures closely resemble those recently adoptedby the FDIC, 12 CFR 308.33, 53 FR 51678, and codify existing practice inmost Board adjudications today.The Board believes that these new provisions will streamline its proceedingsconsiderably. Resolving as many evidentiary, factual, and legal issuesas possible in advance of the hearing will narrow the focus and shortenthe time required for the hearing by ensuring that only those matters thatare genuinely contested need to be established before the AdministrativeLaw Judge. Prehearing identification of exhibits will give each party theopportunity to know in advance what materials the opposing party plansto introduce. This will give each party the chance to formulate any applicableobjections to the introduction of such materials and submit those objectionsto the Administrative Law Judge prior to the actual hearing, thereby eliminatingthe need for time-consuming arguments regarding the admissibility of documentsat the hearing. It is contemplated by the proposed rule that objectionsto the introduction of exhibits and rulings thereon will be handled inthis fashion during the prehearing stage, so that all exhibits to whichobjection has not been taken, or that the Administrative Law Judge determinesshould be admitted into evidence, may simply be considered part of thehearing record and utilized by the parties at the hearing without the needfor document-by-document introduction by counsel or an individual rulingby the Administrative Law Judge on each exhibit. In this regard, the Boardnotes that authenticity of documents should seldom be an issue in administrativeproceedings. This is especially true because many of the documents to beintroduced in the Board's proceedings will consist of records of the insuredinstitution to which the particular proceeding pertains, reports or othermaterials filed by the institution with the Board pursuant to its regulations,other records of which the Board may take official notice, or public records.Furthermore, even where a document does not fall into one of the abovecategories, the Board believes that authenticity should become an issueonly if there is a good faith reason to doubt the genuineness of a document.The Board is of the opinion that the prehearing procedures adopted todaywill permit the parties to eliminate as many problems and needless timedelays as possible in this area.<ITAG tagnum="81">10. Discovery</ITAG>New andSection; 509.21 provides for limited discovery. Paragraph (a) statesthe general rule that discovery may be obtained only through the productionof documents and in accordance with the procedures set forth in andSection;509.21 and through no other means. Privileged documents are not discoverable.A party seeking to obtain discovery must serve a motion for discovery settingforth the reasons that discovery is necessary. The request must set forthfacts and arguments sufficient to demonstrate that the documents soughtare relevant and material to the party's case or defense, that the partyhas substantial need for the materials, and that the location and productionof the materials will not result in any undue burden to any other partyor in any undue delay in the proceeding. Upon a clear showing that thesecriteria have been satisfied, the Administrative Law Judge may grant allor such part of the party's request as he deems appropriate under the circumstances.The party from whom the documents are sought has 20 days to furnish thedocuments to the requesting party unless the parties agree on a differenttime or the Administrative Law Judge sets a different time for good causeshown. Failure to comply with an order of the Administrative Law Judgegranting a discovery request within the prescribed time period is a groundfor a motion to compel production of the documents and may result in theimposition of sanctions by the Administrative Law Judge pursuant to hisauthority under andSection; 509.5(c). Upon a showing that discovery is beingconducted in bad faith or in such a manner as unreasonably to annoy, oppress,or embarrass any party, the Administrative Law Judge may order that discoverybe terminated or may limit the scope and/or manner of discovery. All discovery,including all responses to discovery requests, must be completed not lessthan 30 days prior to the date scheduled for the commencement of the hearingunless the Administrative Law Judge finds on the record that good causeclearly exists for an exception to this requirement.As noted above, the Board has long taken the position that there is nogeneral right to prehearing discovery for respondents in administrativeenforcement proceedings, and the case law supports this view. The Boardis, however, adopting this amendment in response to commentary, principallyfrom the private bar, that some form of discovery should be available torespondents as a matter of fairness. <T3>See, e.g., </T3> Shockey, <T3>Discovery in Bank Regulatory Agency Enforcement Actions, </T3>42 Bus.Law. 91 (1986). While the Board is sensitive to this concern, it also believesthat it is imperative that discovery be limited to only those materialsthat are truly necessary for a party adequately to prepare its case ordefense. In particular, the Board is concerned that discovery provisionsnot become vehicles for ``fishing expeditions'' whose principal purposeis to delay the proceedings, delve into matters that would yield materialsof little or no legal relevance in the preparation of a party's case ordefense, or probe the mental processes of the agency's decision makers.Accordingly, the Board believes that it is appropriate to require thatparties seeking discovery be required to demonstrate a clear need for thematerials sought and that opposing parties have the opportunity to respondto these contentions.The Board notes that the prehearing procedures being adopted today, suchas the prehearing exchange of exhibits, witness lists, testimony summaries,and prehearing memoranda should give each party a sufficient opportunitywell in advance of the hearing to know the basis of each claim or defenseto be asserted by the opposing party. These procedures contain significantprovisions for the prehearing exchange of information by the parties, sothat in normal circumstances, additional formal discovery should seldombe necessary. An example of an appropriate discovery request might be arequest for copies of pertinent portions of transcripts of testimony ofwitnesses taken during a formal examination or investigative proceedingprior to the commencement of the adjudicatory proceeding and who are expectedto testify at the hearing, together with the exhibits to those transcripts.<ITAG tagnum="81">11. Subpoenas</ITAG>Section 509.22 contains technical and clarifying amendments to the Board'sprocedural rule governing subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnessesand the production of physical evidence. It makes clear that subpoenasare to be issued only to require witnesses to testify and produce documentsat the hearing, rather than as discovery devices to require prehearingdepositions and the production of documents in advance of the hearing.A separate provision, andSection; 509.23, addresses the taking of depositionsfor purposes of preserving the testimony of witnesses who will be unavailableto testify at the hearing. Moreover, because of the requirements of andSection;509.19 that proposed exhibits be provided to the opposing party and submittedto the Administrative Law Judge in advance of the hearing, and of andSection;509.21 providing for orders to compel the production of documents in thediscovery process, there should seldom, if ever, be a need for subpoenasfor the production of documents in advance of the hearing. The portionof the rule governing document production is primarily intended to coverinstances in which, for example, a party knows of the existence of a materialdocument in the possession of a prospective nonparty witness but has beenunable to obtain a copy of the document voluntarily. In that event, theBoard believes that the party should have the ability to require the witnessto appear at the hearing and produce that document despite the generalrequirement that all exhibits or a list thereof be submitted in advance.The rule is not, however, intended to require a witness to produce at orprior to a hearing a voluminous amount of material that has not been identifiedin advance of the hearing and may be of little or no relevance.The rule also lengthens from 5 days to 10 days the time within which aperson to whom a subpoena is directed may move to quash the subpoena andclarifies that the party at whose request the subpoena is issued is responsiblefor serving the subpoena once it is executed by the Administrative LawJudge.<ITAG tagnum="81">12. Depositions</ITAG>Section 509.23 sets forth the procedures for the taking of depositionsin adjudicatory proceedings. The rule requires that a party desiring totake the deposition of a witness first apply to the Administrative LawJudge setting forth the reasons that the deposition is necessary. Any partymay serve a response to such an application within 10 days of receipt ofa copy of the application. The Administrative Law Judge may permit thedeposition to be taken only upon a showing that the prospective deponentwill be or is likely to be unavailable to testify at the hearing, the testimonywill be relevant and material to the proceeding, <T3>and</T3> the taking of the deposition will not result in any undueburden to any other party or in undue delay in the proceeding.The requirement of prior application to the Administrative Law Judge hasexisted in the Board's procedural rules for many years. Previously, andSection;509.8set forth a procedure for depositions only in connection with hearingsprovided for in Part 509a (which are not conducted under the AdministrativeProcedure Act), Part 565, or andSection;583.26, but did not apply to otherhearings conducted pursuant to Part 509. See former 12 CFR 509.8(a) and(b). New andSection;509.23 will apply to any hearing conducted under part509. The new provision will not apply to hearings conducted under Part509a, as these hearings are not conducted under the Administrative ProcedureAct. Furthermore, the references to Part 565 and andSection;583.26(d) arebeing eliminated as unnecessary, as hearings conducted pursuant to theseprovisions are already expressly covered by Part 509. See andSection;509.1(d)(termination of insurance) and andSection;509.1(e) (hearings under the Savingsand Loan Holding Company Act). This procedure maintains the Board's existingposition regarding general discovery in administrative enforcement proceedings,while permitting depositions for the limited purpose of preserving testimonywhere a material witness will be unavailable. <ITAG tagnum="81">13. Official Notice </ITAG>A new provision, andSection;509.24(b), permits the Administrative Law Judgeor the Board to take official notice of any material fact that might bejudicially noticed by a district court of the United States and of anymaterial information in the official public records of the Board. The Boardbelieves that this revision will likewise expedite proceedings by eliminatingthe need to ``prove'' obvious facts. If any party requests that officialnotice be taken of any fact, other parties to the proceeding will be affordedthe opportunity to establish the contrary. <ITAG tagnum="81">14. Public and Private Hearings </ITAG>Section 509.25 combines the provisions of former andSection;509.6(c) andandSection;509.21 and adds a new provision. It provides that, unless a publichearing is ordered by the Board in the public interest, all hearings shallbe private and attended only by the parties, their representatives or counsel,witnesses while testifying, and other persons having an official interestin the proceeding. The entire record in the proceeding is to remain confidentialunless otherwise ordered by the Board or required by law. The new provisionpermits the Administrative Law Judge to take appropriate steps in publichearings to protect the reputations and integrity of nonparties to theproceeding, including closing portions of such hearings to the public andadmitting materials into the record under seal. <ITAG tagnum="81">15. Summary Disposition </ITAG>The Board is adopting a procedure, similar to those utilized by a numberof other administrative agencies, for summary disposition of proceedingsin which the material facts are undisputed.\1\<NOTE/> Under new andSection;509.26, any party who believes that thereis no genuine dispute as to the material facts of an adjudicatory proceedingand that he is entitled to judgment as a matter of law may move for summarydisposition of all or any part of the proceeding. That party will thenbe required to submit a statement of the material facts he contends arenot in dispute, accompanied by a brief in support of his contention thathe is entitled to judgment as a matter of law. Any other party may thensubmit an opposition to the motion for summary disposition and/or may countermovefor summary disposition. Upon receipt of the parties' papers, the AdministrativeLaw Judge may require additional briefing or schedule oral argument onthe motion or motions. Thereafter, if the Administrative Law Judge determinesthat there is no dispute as to the material facts in the proceeding, thata hearing to adduce further facts is unnecessary, and that any party isentitled to a decision in his favor as a matter of law, he will submita recommended decision to the Board pursuant to andSection;509.27(c). Thecase then proceeds as set out in new andSection;andSection;509.29 to 509.32.No such recommendation to the Board is required if the Administrative LawJudge determines that no party is entitled to summary disposition. In addition,if the Administrative Law Judge determines that a party is entitled tojudgment only on certain claims but not on all claims on which he has movedfor summary disposition, the Administrative Law Judge is not required tosubmit a recommended decision to the Board until after the hearing hadbeen concluded. Instead, he may issue a prehearing order stating that theidentified matters upon which the party is entitled to judgment will notneed to be addressed at the hearing. Following the hearing, the AdministrativeLaw Judge will simply incorporate his findings of fact and conclusionsof law on the claims summarily disposed of into his recommended decisionto the Board. Alternatively, the Administrative Law Judge may find thatan order should be entered based on the presence of all of the necessarystatutory elements regarding certain transactions or occurrences only,while not necessarily making a similar finding with respect to other transactionsor occurrences alleged in a notice. Thus, for example, in a removal/prohibitionproceeding, the Office of Enforcement may move for summary dispositionbased on allegations concerning two loan transactions. If the AdministrativeLaw Judge found that one, but not both, of the transactions contained nodispute as to the material facts and that all of the elements requiredunder the NHA or the HOLA to support a removal/prohibition order were present,he could recommend to the Board that a removal/prohibition order be issuedbased on that transaction, thereby obviating the need for a fact findinghearing on either transaction.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\<T3>See e.g., </T3>7 CFR 10.91 (Commodity Futures Trading Commission);16 CFR 3.24 (Federal Trade Commission). In moving for or opposing summary disposition, a party may not rely onmere allegations, but must submit documentary evidence, stipulations, admissionsin pleadings, and/or deposition testimony in support of his contention.   The Board is adopting this procedure in order to provide a mechanism forfuther shortening and streamlining of proceedings, thereby saving the parties,the Board, and its staff considerable time and expense. The Board wishesto emphasize that the proposed summary disposition procedure is not intendedto deprive any respondent of the opportunity to appear before the AdministrativeLaw Judge to present its case. Rather, the board is providing an alternativemechanism whereby a ``fact trial'' may be dispensed with, and written submissionsand/or an oral argument on the law substituted, where there are no disputedmaterial facts. The Board does not believe that such a procedure will deprivea respondent of any ``hearing'' to which he is entitled under the HOLA,the NHA, or any of the Board's other enabling statutes. Instead, it merelyprovides that the hearing could take a different form; instead of a lengthy``trial'' to determine the facts, the hearing may consist of oral argumentand/or legal briefing as to the proper application of relevant legal principlesto the uncontested facts. The board therefore believes that the new procedureis fully in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative ProcedureAct and due process of law. <ITAG tagnum="81">16. Review by the Board on its Own Initiative </ITAG>Section 509.29, dealing with exceptions to the recommended decision ofthe Administrative Law Judge, is unchanged from the prior provision inthis area with one exception. New andSection;509.29(c) permits the Board,on its own initiative, to review all or any part of a recommended decisionof an Administrative Law Judge within 30 days after the recommended decisionhas been served on all parties. Notice of any order of the Board directingreview on its own initiative will be served on all parties by the Secretariat.This provision is intended to permit the Board to review any aspect ofa recommended decision that it may deem appropriate, irrespective of whetherthe parties have filed exceptions to that portion of the recommended decision.<ITAG tagnum="81">17. Oral Argument Before the Board </ITAG>Section 509.30 revises former andSection;509.14 concerning oral argumentbefore the Board on the recommended decision of the Administrative LawJudge and the findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the recommendeddecision was based. The principal change from the prior provision is thatany party requesting oral argument before the Board must show good causeas to why oral argument is necessary, including the reasons that any argumentproposed to be presented orally was not, or could not be, adequately presentedin writing. <ITAG tagnum="81">18. Decison of the Board </ITAG>Section 509.32 adds a provision to the former andSection;509.16, regardingthe decision of the Board, providing that employees of the Board who havenot engaged in any way in the performance of investigatory or adjudicatoryfunctions in connection with a proceeding may, pursuant to delegated authority,advise and assist the Board in its consideration of that proceeding. Thisprovision is intended to apply to those situations in which matters mustbe decided by the Board itself, rather than the Administrative Law Judgehearing the case. Included in this category would be motions submittedto the board prior to the appointment of the Administrative Law Judge,motions to dismiss a proceeding (which only the Board may decide), andthe final decision of the board following the Administrative Law Judge'srecommended decision. B. Subpart B: Assessment of Civil Money Penalties A new Subpart B sets forth specific procedures for proceedings to determinewhether and to what extent civil money penalties should be assessed againstinsured institutions, their affiliates, service corporations, savings andloan holding companies, subsidiaries thereof, and/or related officialsagainst whom the board has the authority to impose civil money penalties.These provisions, as well as the provisions of Subpart A, apply to theseproceedings. Proceedings to assess civil money penalties will commence with the issuanceof a notice of assessment of civil money penalty. The notice is to containa statement of the facts constituting the grounds for the assessment ofthe penalty, the amount of the penalty, the date by which the penalty isto be paid, and a statement informing the party being assessed the penaltyof its right to request a hearing to contest the assessment of the penaltywithin 10 days after service of the notice. A party requesting a hearingis additionally required to file an answer as prescribed in proposed andSection;509.14within 20 days of service of the notice of assessment. Upon receipt ofa request for a hearing, the Board will serve the party afforded the hearingwith notice of the time and place for the hearing. The hearing will bescheduled at least 30 days, but not more than 60 days, following the serviceof the notice of hearing, and will be conducted in accordance with theprocedural provisions of Subpart A. A party requesting a hearing need notpay the penalty until after the hearing has been conducted. Upon service of the Board's final decision and order, if adverse to therespondent, (or in the event that the respondent consents to the assessmentof the penalty), payment of the penalty will be made as provided in andSection;509.38.In determining the amount of the penalty to be assessed, the Board willconsider the financial strength and good faith of the person or entitybeing assessed, the seriousness of the violation, any previous violations,and any other matters that the interests of justice may require. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Revisions To Part 512 </ITAG>The Board is also adopting several technical changes to Part 512, its Rulesfor Investigative Proceedings and Formal Examination Proceedings. The revisionsare summarized below. The definition of ``formal examination proceeding'' contained in andSection;512.2(c)is being revised to reflect the clarification of the Board's authorityprovided by the Competitive Equality Banking Act of 1987, Pub. L. No. 100-86,101 Stat. 552 (``CEBA''). The CEBA clarifies that the Board may conductinvestigations of persons seeking to acquire control of insured institutionspursuant to the Control Act and may utilize its formal examination authorityin doing so, as well as in investigating other possible violations of theControl Act. Section 512.3 is being amended to state simply that all materials gatheredduring the course of any formal examination proceeding or investigativeproceeding are confidential. This is simply a grammatical change, and theBoard does not intend any substantive departure form its current practicein this area.   Section 512.4 is being revised to provide that the Director or any DeputyDirector of the Office of Enforcement may approve the release of transcriptsof a witness' own testimony to that witness or his counsel. Previously,the regulation provided that this authorization could be given only bythe Board; in practice, however, the director of the Office of Enforcementperformed this function pursuant to a delegation of authority from theBoard. The amendment therefore simply codifies the agency's present practiceand reduces the number of routine, nonsubstantive matters with which theBoard must deal.  Section 512.5 is being amended in three respects. Paragraph (b)(1) providesthat an attorney who has been suspended or debarred from practice by thehighest court of any state, commonwealth, territory, possession or theDistrict of Columbia, or by the Board in accordance with Part 513 is precludedfrom representing other persons before the Board in investigative and formalexamination proceedings. Previously, the only basis for such preclusionunder andSection;512.5 was suspension or debarment by the Board pursuantto Part 513. Additionally, paragraph (b)(2) is being amended to make itclear that only the attorney actually personally representing a witness(as distinguished from attorneys for the institutions that are the subjectsof investigative or formal examination proceedings or for other witnessesor interested persons) may accompany that witness during the taking ofthat witness' testimony. Again, this is the practice that has been followedby the Board for many years in this area, and the amendment is of a clarifyingnature only.  Former andSection;512.5(c) is being deleted. That paragraph provided thatin a public investigative proceeding conducted under the Holding CompanyAct, if the record contained allegations of wrongdoing by any individual,the person had the right to appear on the record and to cross-examine witnessesand produce rebuttal testimony and documentary evidence. The Board is deletingthis provision for a number of reasons. First, in the nearly 20 years thatthe rule had been in existence, the Board and its staff had no record ofthe Board's ever having conducted a ``public investigative proceeding.''Second, the whole notion of cross-examination and the presentation of ``rebuttal''testimony and documentary evidence is inconsistent with the function ofan investigation: the purpose of an investigative proceeding is to developfacts in order to determine whether violations of laws, rules, or regulationshave occurred and whether an insured institution and individuals thereinhave engaged in unsafe or unsound practices with respect to the institution,its subsidiaries, or its affiliates, thereby providing a basis for futureenforcement action. It does not, however, determine rights or results inthe issuance of orders. Permitting individuals to present ``rebuttal''evidence during the course of an investigation fundamentally alters thenature of the proceeding by converting the investigation into a trial.This, in turn, can result in substantial delays with little or no benefitto the decision making process. In fact, the FDIC, having experienced preciselythese sorts of pointless delays and arguments in connection with its owninvestigations, recently deleted its own analogous provision, former 12CFR 308.51(d). See 53 FR 51168. In the preamble to its amendments, theFDIC observed that rather than producing useful rebuttal information, andSection;308.51(d)had proven confusing and unworkable. <T3>Id</T3>. Of course, the deletion of andSection;512.5(c) does not precludedesignated representatives conducting investigations and formal examinationsfrom using their discretion to seek out evidence or testimony rebuttingor otherwise relating to any apparent wrongdoing. Likewise, no individualis ever precluded from providing information relevant to an investigationor an explanation of his actions to the Board staff if he believes thatcircumstances so require.  Section 512.7, relating to the service of subpoenas, is being amended toadd a provision that would permit service by an express delivery serviceand remove any language implying that a subpoena could be issued at theinstance of anyone other than the Board official(s) conducting the investigativeor formal examination proceeding. \2\<NOTE/> In this regard, new paragraph (a) removes the reference tothe tender of fees and mileage at the time a subpoena is served, and anew separate paragraph (d) provides simply that witnesses summoned to appearin any investigative or formal examination proceeding will be paid thesame fees and mileage paid to witnesses in United States district courts.Paragraph (b) is being revised to provide that all motions to quash subpoenasissue in any investigative or formal examination proceeding must be addressedto and decided by the Director or any Deputy Director of the Office ofEnforcement. Finally, paragraph (c) is being amended to provide that foreignnationals are subject to service of subpoenas if service is made upon aduly authorized agent of that person located in the United States. Again,this revision comports with the Board's current interpretation and practiceon this issued and does not represent a substantive change.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\The former version of andSection;512.7 implied that a subpoenacould be issued by and served at the instance of a person calling ``rebuttal''witnesses pursuant to andSection;512.5(c). However, in view of the deletionof andSection;512.5(c) announced today, any such implication would be unnecessaryand inappropriate.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Final Regulatory Flexibility Analysis  </ITAG>Pursuant to section 3 of the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 604,the Board is providing the following regulatory flexibility analysis: 1. <T3>Need for and objectives of the rules.</T3> These elements are incorporatedabove in SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION.  2. <T3>Issues raised by comments and agency assessment and response.</T3>These elements are incorporated above in the SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION.3. <T3>Significant alternatives minimizing small-entity impact and agencyresponse.</T3> The Rules of Practice and Procedure and Rules for InvestigativeProceedings and Formal Examination Proceedings apply equally to all insuredinstitutions. The rules impose no new recordkeeping requirements or otheradditional administrative burden on any insured institution.  <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Parts 509 and 512  </ITAG>Administrative practice and procedure, Investigations.Accordingly, the Board hereby proposes to amend Parts 509 and 512, SubchapterA, Chapter V, Title 12, <T3>Code of Federal Regulations,</T3> as set forth below.  1. Part 509 is revised to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER A_GENERAL  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 509_RULES OF PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE IN ADJUDICATORY PROCEEDINGS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.1 Scope of regulations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.2 Definitions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.3 Appointment of Administrative Law Judge.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.4 Authority of the Administrative Law Judge.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.5 Appearance and practice in adjudicatory proceedings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.6 Good faith certification.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.7 Ex parte communications.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.8 Maintenance of the record.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.9 Service.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.10 Filing of papers.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.11 Formal requirements as to papers filed.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.12 Computing time.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.13 Notice.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.14 Answer.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.15 Amending pleadings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.16 Consolidation and severance of proceedings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.17 Motions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.18 Interlocutory review.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.19 Prehearing conference and exchange of information.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.20 Opportunity for informal settlement.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.21 Discovery.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.22 Subpoenas for documentary or physical evidence or for witnessattendance.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.23 Depositions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.24 Conduct of hearings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.25 Private and public hearings.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.26 Summary disposition.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.27 Proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and recommendeddecision.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.28 Briefs.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.29 Exceptions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.30 Oral argument before the Board.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.31 Notice of submission to the Board.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.32 Decision of the Board.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Assessment of Civil Money Penalties  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.33 Scope.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.34 Notice of assessment; request for hearing; answer.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.35 Notice of hearing.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.36 Assessment orders.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.37 Payment of civil penalty.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">509.38 Relevant considerations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1437);sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464); secs. 402, 403, 407,48 Stat. 1256, 1257, 1260, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1725, 1726, 1730); sec.408, 82 Stat. 5, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1730a); sec. 12, 48 Stat. 892, asamended (15 U.S.C. 78<T3>l</T3>); Reorg. Plan No. 3 of 1947, 3 CFR, 1943-1948 Comp.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.1  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of regulations.  </ITAG>This part prescribes rules of practice and procedure applicable to adjudicatoryproceedings as to which hearings are provided by the following statutoryprovisions:  (a) Hearings under section 6(i) of the Federal Home Loan Bank Act, as amended,12 U.S.C. 1426(i), to determine whether cause exists for the removal ofany member of a Federal Home Loan Bank from membership or for deprivingany non-member borrower of the privilege of obtaining advances from a FederalHome Loan Bank;  (b) Hearings in cease and desist proceedings under section 5(d)(2) of theHome Owners' Loan Act of 1933, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 1464(d)(2) (``HOLA'')and section 407(e) of the National Housing Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 1730(e)(``NHA'');  (c) Hearings under section 5(d)(4) of the HOLA, 12 U.S.C. 1464(d)(4), andsection 407(g) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730(g), to determine whether a director,officer, or other person should be removed from office and/or prohibitedfrom further participation in the conduct of the affairs of an insuredinstitution;  (d) Hearings under section 407(b) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730(b), to determinewhether cause exists for the termination of the insured status of any institutionthe accounts of which are insured by the Federal Savings and Loan InsuranceCorporation;  (e) Hearings under section 408(a)(2)(D) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(a)(2)(D),to determine whether any person directly or indirectly exercises a controllinginfluence over the management or policies of an insured institution orany other company; (f) Hearings under section 407(k)(3) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730(k)(3),section 408(j)(4)C) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(j)(4)(C), and section 5(d)(8)(B)of the HOLA, 12 U.S.C. 1464(d)(8)(B), to determine whether and/or to whatextent civil penalties should be assessed against institutions, affiliates,service corporations, savings and loan holding companies, subsidiariesthereof and/or related officials in violation of any order issued underthe Board's cease-and-desist authority or any provision of section 408of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a, or any regulation (see Parts 583 and 584 ofSubchapter F of this chapter) or order issued pursuant thereto;(g) Hearings under section 408(h)(5)(A) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(h)(5)(A),to determine whether to terminate certain activities by savings and loanholding companies or to terminate ownership or control of a non-insuredsavings and loan holding company subsidiary;(h) Hearings under section 407(q)(4) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730(q)(4),to determine whether the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporationshould issue an order to approve or disapprove a person's proposed acquisitionof an insured institution and/or savings and loan holding company; and(i) Hearings under section 15(c)(4) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934,15 U.S.C. 78o(c)(4) (the ``Exchange Act''), to determine whether any institutionor person subject to the jurisdiction of the Board pursuant to section12(i) of the Exchange Act, 15 U.S.C. 78<T3>l</T3>(i), has failed to comply with the provisions of sections 12,13, 14(a), 14(c), 14(d), or 14(f) of the Exchange Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part:(a) The term ``adjudicatory proceeding'' means a proceeding conducted pursuantto this part and leading to the formulation of a final order other thana regulation.(b) The term ``institution'' means a Federally-chartered association withinthe meaning of section 5(d) of the HOLA, 12 U.S.C. 1464(d), an institutionwhose accounts are insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation(``insured institution'') within the meaning of section 401(a) of the NHA,12 U.S.C. 1730(a), a subsidiary of an insured institution, a savings andloan holding company within the meaning of section 408(a)(1)(D) of theNHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(a)(1)(D), and a subsidiary of a savings and loan holdingcompany within the meaning of section 408(a)(1)(H) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C.1730a(a)(1)(H).(c) The term ``Board'' means the Federal Home Loan Bank Board or, whereappropriate, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.(d) The term ``Secretariat'' means the Office of the Secretary to the FederalHome Loan Bank Board, including any Acting or Assistant Secretary to theBoard, as defined at andSection;500.11 of this subchapter.(e) The term ``Administrative Law Judge'' means an administrative law judgeappointed pursuant to section 3105 or detailed to the Board pursuant tosection 3344 of Title 5 of the United States Code to preside at a hearingconducted in accordance with this part. As used in this part, the termalso shall refer to the Board or any person to whom the Board has delegatedauthority to act when an Administrative Law Judge has not been appointedor is unavailable.(f) The term ``party means an institution or person named as a respondentin any adjudicatory proceeding. The Office of Enforcement of the Boardalso is deemed to be a party to all proceedings under this part.(g) The term ``Respondent'' means any institution or person against whomthe Board seeks relief in the notice commencing the adjudicatory proceeding.(h) The term ``notice'' means the notice that commences the adjudicatoryproceeding, is served upon the Respondent by the Board, and designatesa date, time, and place for the hearing to be conducted in connection withthe allegations in the notice.(i) Any use of a masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall be deemedto encompass whichever usage would be appropriate under the circumstances,in accordance with andSection;500.6 of this subchapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appointment of Administrative Law Judge.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Appointment. </T3>Unless otherwise directed by the Board, all hearingsunder this part shall be conducted by an Administrative Law Judge appointedby the United States Office of Personnel Management.(b) <T3>Procedures. </T3>(1) Following the issuance and service of a notice,the Board or any person designated by the Board shall promptly requestthe appointment of an Administrative Law Judge to conduct the proceeding.(2) Upon notification that an Administrative Law Judge has been appointed,the Board or any person designated by the Board shall advise the partiesin writing of such appointment.(3) If for any reason the designated Administrative Law Judge is unableto conduct or complete the proceeding for which he was appointed, a successorAdministrative Law Judge shall be requested and appointed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Authority of the Administrative Law Judge.</ITAG>All hearings governed by this part shall be conducted in accordance withthe provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 5 of the United States Code. The AdministrativeLaw Judge designated pursuant to this part to preside at any such hearingshall be in charge of the hearing and shall have the duty to conduct itin a fair and impartial manner and to take all action to avoid unnecessarydelay in the disposition of the proceeding. Such Administrative Law Judgeshall have all powers necessary to that end, including the following powers:(a) To administer oaths and affirmations;(b) To issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, as authorized by thispart, and to revoke, quash, or modify any such subpoenas;(c) To receive relevant evidence and to rule upon the admission of evidenceand offers of proof;(d) To take or cause depositions to be taken as authorized by this part;(e) To regulate the course of the hearing and the conduct of the partiesand their counsel;(f) To hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of issuesor for any other proper purpose;(g) As justice may require, to consider and rule upon all procedural andother motions appropriate in an adversarial proceeding, except that onlythe Board shall have the power to grant any motion to dismiss the proceedingor to decide any other motion that results in final determination of themerits of the proceeding; and(h) To prepare and present to the Board a recommended decision as providedherein.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Without limitation on the foregoing, the Administrative Law Judgeshall, subject to the provisions of this part, have all the authority ofsection 556(c) of Title 5 of the United States Code.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appearance and practice in adjudicatory proceedings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Appearance before the Board_</T3>(1) <T3>By non-attorneys.</T3> An individual may appear on his own behalf;an authorized member of a partnership may represent the partnership; abona fide and duly authorized officer of a corporation, trust, or associationmay represent the corporation, trust, or association; and an official oremployee of any governmental unit, agency, or authority may represent thatunit, agency, or authority before the Board (including representation beforethe Administrative Law Judge appointed to conduct the proceeding), unlesssuch individual, partner, officer, or employee has been suspended or debarredfrom practice in accordance with the provisions of Part 513 of this subchapteror excluded or suspended from the proceeding pursuant to paragraph (c)of this section.(2) <T3>By attorneys. </T3>Any person who is a member in good standing of thebar of the highest court of any State, possession, territory, Commonwealth,or the District of Columbia and who has not been suspended or debarredfrom practice before the Board in accordance with the provisions of Part513 of this subchapter or excluded or suspended from a particular proceedingin accordance with paragraph (c) of this section may represent partiesor other persons in such adjudicatory proceeding. An attorney representinga party in an adjudicatory proceeding shall file a notice of appearancewith the Secretariat, containing a written declaration that he is currentlyqualified to practice before the Board as provided by this paragraph (a)(2)and is authorized to represent the particular party on whose behalf heacts. Included in the notice of appearance shall be a written disclosureas to whether the attorney has ever been suspended or debarred from practiceby the bar of any State, territory, Commonwealth, or the District of Columbiaand, if so, the date(s) of any such suspension or debarment and a descriptionof the facts and circumstances surrounding the same.(b) <T3>Conflict of interest in representation. </T3>An individual shall notrepresent another person in an adjudicatory proceeding if it reasonablyappears that such representation may be affected by that individual's responsibilitiesto a third person or by the individual's own interests. The AdministrativeLaw Judge may take corrective measures at any stage of a proceeding tocure a conflict of interest in representation, including the issuance ofan order disqualifying an individual from appearing in a representativecapacity for the duration of the proceeding.(c) <T3>Sanctions. </T3>Dilatory, obstructionist, egregious, contemptuous,or contumacious conduct at any phase of any adjudicatory proceeding underthis part, as determined in the sole discretion of the Administrative LawJudge, may be grounds for exclusion therefrom and suspension for the durationof the proceeding and may be grounds for suspension or debarment pursuantto Part 513 of this subchapter.(d) <T3>Representatives of nonparties. </T3>A nonparty who is required or requestedto testify at a prehearing deposition pursuant to andSection;509.23 may berepresented by any person qualified to represent a party before the Board.Anyone representing a nonparty in such a situation need not file a noticeof appearance unless expressly ordered to do so by the Administrative LawJudge, but may be required by the Administrative Law Judge or any partyto state on the record or in writing the information required in a noticeof appearance. No attorney or other representative who refuses to providesuch information shall be permitted to represent any person in the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Good faith certification.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirement. </T3>After the issuance of the notice, every subsequentwritten presentation by a party represented by an attorney shall be signedby at least one attorney of record in that attorney's individual name andshall state the attorney's business address and telephone number. A partywho is not represented by an attorney shall sign his presentations andshall include his address and telephone number.(b) <T3>Effect of signature. </T3>(1) The signature of an attorney or partyconstitutes a certification by the signer that the attorney or party hasread the presentation; that, to the best of his knowledge, information,and belief formed after reasonable inquiry, the presentation is well groundedin fact and is warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for theextension, modification, or reversal of existing law; and that it is notinterposed for any improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessarydelay or needless increase in the cost of litigation.(2) If a presentation is not signed, it shall be stricken unless it issigned promptly after the omission is called to the attention of the pleaderor movant.(d) <T3>Effect of making oral motion or argument. </T3>The act of making anyoral motion or oral argument by any attorney or party constitutes a certificationby the attorney or party that, to the best of his knowledge, information,and belief formed after reasonable inquiry, his statements are well groundedin fact and are warranted by existing law or a good faith argument forthe extension, modification, or reversal of existing law and are not interposedfor any improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary delayor needless increase in the cost of litigation.(d) <T3>Sanctions for violation. </T3>If a presentation is made in violationof this section, the Administrative Law Judge may, on motion of any partyor on his own motion, impose upon the attorney, represented party, or bothany appropriate sanction authorized by this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;509.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ex parte communications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Definition. </T3>``Ex parte communication'' means any material oralor written communication concerning the merits of an adjudicatory proceedingthat takes place between a party, his counsel, or another person interestedin the proceeding and the Administrative Law Judge handling that proceeding,the Board, any member of the Board, or any person who may reasonably beexpected to be involved in assisting or advising the Board with respectto the preparation of a decision with respect to that proceeding and thatwas neither on the record nor on reasonable prior notice to all parties.(d) <T3>Prohibition of ex parte communications. </T3>From the time the noticeis served, or from the date that a party learns that a notice has beenapproved by the Board, whichever is applicable, until the date that theBoard serves its final decision pursuant to andSection;509.32, no person,including any person involved in the decisional process concerning theproceeding, shall knowingly make or cause to be made an ex parte communicationconcerning the merits of the proceeding.(c) <T3>Communications involving the Administrative Law Judge. </T3>(1) TheAdministrative Law Judge shall not consult anyone within the Board on themerits of an adjudicatory proceeding, except upon notice and opportunityfor all parties to participate in such consultation. This section shallnot be construed as prohibiting the Administrative Law Judge from consultingwith employees or agents of the Board on procedural matters.(2) The Administrative Law Judge shall not be responsible to, nor subjectto the supervision or direction of, any officer, employee, or agent ofthe Board engaged in the performance of investigatory or adjudicatory functions.(d) <T3>Procedure upon occurrence of ex parte communication. </T3>If an exparte communication is received by the Administrative Law Judge, the Board,any member of the Board, or other person identified in paragraph (a) ofthis section, that person shall cause all such written communications (or,if the communication is oral, a memorandum stating the substance of thecommunication) to be placed on the record of the proceeding and servedon all parties. All other parties to the proceeding shall have an opportunity,within 10 days of receipt of service of the ex parte communication to fileresponses thereto and to recommend any sanctions that they believe to beappropriate under the circumstances. The Administrative Law Judge shallthen determine whether any action should be taken concerning the ex partecommunication and, if so, what that action should be.(e) <T3>Sanctions. </T3>To the extent consistent with the interests of justiceand the policy of the NHA, the HOLA, and/or the Federal Home Loan BankAct, knowing violation of this section may be a ground for a decision adverseto a party who violates this section or may be a ground for suspensionor debarment of any person engaging in such conduct under the proceduresset forth in andSection; 509.5(c) herein or in Part 513 of this subchapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maintenance of the record.</ITAG>The transcript of testimony and exhibits, together with all papers andrequests (including motions, stipulations, exceptions, rulings, pleadings,briefs, and other materials filed in connection with the proceeding) shallconstitute the exclusive record for decision in accordance with this part.The Secretariat shall maintain the official record of all papers filedin each proceeding under this part. Upon appointment of the AdministrativeLaw Judge, the Secretariat shall forward to the Administrative Law Judgea copy of the existing record of the proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service.</ITAG>(a) <T3>By the Board. </T3>All documents or papers required to be served bythe Board upon any party afforded a hearing shall be served by the Secretariatunless some other person shall be designated for such purpose by the Board.Such service, except for service on counsel for the Office of Enforcement,shall be made by personal service or by registered or certified mail, addressedto the last known address of such party, or on the attorney or representativeof record of such party, provided that if there is no attorney or representativeof record, such service shall be made upon such party at the last knownaddress of such party. Such service may also be made in such other mannerreasonably calculated to give actual notice as the Board may by regulationor otherwise provide.(b) <T3>By the parties. </T3>Except as otherwise expressly provided in thispart, all documents or papers filed in a proceeding under this part shallbe served by the party filing the same upon the attorneys or representativesof record of all other parties to the proceeding or, if any party is notso represented, then upon such party. Such service may be made by personalservice, by registered, certified, or regular first-class mail, or by anexpress delivery service addressed to the last known address of such partiesor to their attorneys or representatives of record. Service shall be deemedto have been made at the time of personal service, upon deposit in theUnited States mails of a properly addressed and postage-paid document,or upon delivery of such document to an express delivery service. All suchdocuments or papers shall include a certificate, signed by the person makingservice and stating that such service on other parties has been made andindicating the date and method of such service.(c) <T3>By the Administrative Law Judge. </T3>Copies of all orders and rulingson motions by the Administrative Law Judge shall be served on all partiesto the proceeding in the same manner as described in paragraph (b) of thissection. The Administrative Law Judge shall file the original of all rulingsand orders by him with the Secretariat. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing of papers.</ITAG>(a) Unless otherwise specifically provided in the notice or by the AdministrativeLaw Judge, an original and one copy of all documents and papers requiredto be served under this part shall be filed with the Secretariat, witha copy to the Administrative Law Judge after he is designated. This ruleshall not apply to the transcript of testimony and exhibits adduced atthe hearing or to proposed exhibits submitted in advance of the hearingpursuant to an order of the Administrative Law Judge pursuant to andSection;509.19.(b) All material required to be filed with the Board or the Secretariatshall be filed with the Secretariat, Federal Home Loan Bank Board, 1700G Street, NW., Washington, DC 20552. Any such filing with the Secretariatshall be made at the time of service or within a reasonable time thereafter,but must be received by the Secretariat in Washington, DC, within threebusiness days of service on the other parties.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Formal requirements as to papers filed.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Form. </T3>All papers filed under this part shall be double spacedand printed or typewritten on 8\1/2\ by 11 inch paper. All copies shallbe clear and legible.(b) <T3>Signature. </T3>The original of all papers filed by a party shall besigned by such party of by the duly authorized agent or attorney of suchparty and must show the address of the signer. Counsel for the Office ofEnforcement shall sign the original of all papers filed by that Office.(c) <T3>Caption. </T3>All papers filed must include at the head thereof, oron the title page, the name of the Board or FSLIC, the name of the partyafforded the hearing, the number of the resolution giving notice of thehearing, and the subject matter of the particular paper.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computing time.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>In computing any period of time prescribed or allowedby this part, the date of the act, event, or default from which the designatedperiod of time begins to run is not to be included. The last day so computedshall be included, unless it is a Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday,in which event the period shall run until the end of the next day thatis neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor such federal holiday. When the periodof time prescribed or allowed is 10 days or less, intermediate Saturdays,Sundays, and such federal holidays shall be excluded in the computation.(b) <T3>Service by mail.</T3> Whenever any party has the right or is requiredto do some act within a period of time prescribed in this part after theservice upon him of any document or other paper of any kind, and such serviceis made by mail, three days shall be added to the prescribed period; <T3>Provided, however,</T3> That if an overnight mail service is used,only one day shall be added to the prescribed period.(c) <T3>Change of time limits.</T3> Except as otherwise provided by law, theAdministrative Law Judge may, at the request of the parties or <T3>sua sponte,</T3> extent the time limits prescribed by these rules orby any notice or order issued in the proceedings for good cause shown.Prior to the appointment of an Administrative Law Judge and after the filingof a recommended decision pursuant to andSection; 509.27(d), the Board orany person designated by the Board may grant such extensions for good causeshown.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice.</ITAG>Whenever a hearing is ordered by the Board in any proceeding provided forin this part, a notice shall be served by the Secretariat, or other persondesignated for such purpose by the Board, upon the party or parties affordedthe hearing. Such notice shall state the time, place, and nature of thehearing, the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing isto be held, and, if an Administrative Law Judge has been designated topreside at the hearing, the name and address of such Administrative LawJudge. Such notice shall also contain a statement of the matters of factand law constituting the grounds for the hearing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Answer.</ITAG>(a) <T3>When required.</T3> In any notice commencing an adjudicatory proceeding,the Board shall direct the party or parties afforded the hearing to filean answer to the allegations contained in the notice. Except where a differentperiod of not less than 10 days after service of a notice is specifiedby the Board, a party shall file an answer with the Secretariat within20 days after service upon him of the notice.(b) <T3>Requirements of answer; effect of failure to deny.</T3> An answer filedunder this section shall concisely state any defenses and specificallyadmit or deny each allegation in the notice, unless the party is withoutknowledge or information, in which case his answer shall so state and suchstatement shall have the effect of a denial. Any allegation not deniedshall be deemed to be admitted. When a party contends in good faith thatpart of an allegation is false, he shall specify so much of it as is trueand shall deny only the remainder.(c) <T3>Admitted allegations.</T3> If a party filing an answer under this sectionelects not to contest any of the allegations of fact set forth in the notice,his answer shall consist of a statement that he admits all of the allegationsto be true. Such answer shall constitute a waiver of hearing as to thefacts alleged in the notice. All parties will then have an opportunityto serve proposed findings of fact, conclusions of law, and a discussionof the appropriate remedy under the circumstances, together with supportingbriefs, with copies to the Administrative Law Judge. These filings, togetherwith the notice, shall provide a record basis on which the AdministrativeLaw Judge shall file with the Secretariat his recommended decision in accordancewith section 557 of Title 5 of the United States Code.(d) <T3>Effect of failure to answer.</T3> Failure of a party to file an answerrequired by this section within the time provided shall be deemed to constitutea waiver of his right to appear and contest the allegations in the notice.If no answer is filed, the Administrative Law Judge, without further noticeto the party, may receive proposed findings of fact, conclusions of law,and a recommended order from the Office of Enforcement and, based thereon,may find the facts to be as alleged in the notice and file with the Secretariata recommended decision containing such findings and appropriate conclusions.The Administrative Law Judge may, for good cause shown, permit the filingof a delayed answer after the time for filing the answer has expired, providedthat a request to file such a delayed answer is made to the AdministrativeLaw Judge within the time prescribed for the filing of the answer. No requestto file a delayed answer will be considered after the time for filing theanswer has expired.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amending pleadings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Amendments.</T3> The notice or answer may be amended or supplementedat any stage of the proceeding by leave of the Administrative Law Judge.Such leave shall be freely given. The respondent shall answer an amendednotice within the time remaining for the respondent's answer to the originalnotice, or within ten days after service of the amended notice, whicheverperiod is longer, unless the Administrative Law Judge orders otherwisefor good cause shown.(b) <T3>Amendments to conform to the evidence.</T3> When issues not raisedin the notice or answer are tried at the hearing by express or impliedconsent of the parties, they shall be treated in all respects as if theyhave been raised in the notice or answer and no formal amendments shallbe required. If evidence is objected to at the hearing on the ground thatit is not within the issues raised by the notice or answer, the AdministrativeLaw Judge may allow the notice or answer to be amended and shall do sofreely when the presentation of the merits of the action will be servedthereby and the objecting party fails to satisfy the Administrative LawJudge that the admission of such evidence would unfairly prejudice thatparty's action or defense upon the merits. The Administrative Law Judgemay grant a continuance to enable the objecting party to meet such evidence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consolidation and severance of proceedings.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Consolidation.</T3> On motion of any party, or upon the initiativeof the Administrative Law Judge, or by resolution of the Board:(1) Any two or more proceedings may be consolidated for some or all purposesif each proceeding involves or arises out of the same transaction or occurrence,or series of transactions or occurrences, and material common questionsof law or fact will arise in each of the proceedings, unless such consolidationwould cause unreasonable delay or injustice.(2) Any two or more proceedings against the same or at least one commonrespondent that involve or arise out of the same transaction or occurrence,or series of transactions or occurrences, and involve common questionsof law or fact may be consolidated for some or all purposes, unless suchconsolidation would cause unreasonable delay or manifest injustice.(b) <T3>Severance.</T3> On the motion of any party or upon the initiative ofthe Administrative Law Judge, or by resolution of the Board, a proceedinginvolving two or more respondents may be severed for some or all purposesif:(1) Severance is appropriate because the proceeding against one or morerespondents is settled, stayed, or cannot proceed; or(2) Severance will promote prompt resolution of the proceeding as to onerespondent, or as to some or all respondents; or(3) Severance is otherwise required to prevent manifest injustice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Motions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>In writing.</T3> An application or request for an order or ruling nototherwise specifically provided for in this part shall be made by motion.After an Administrative Law Judge has been designated to preside at a hearingand before the filing with the Secretariat of his recommended decision,all such motions shall be filed with the Secretariat, with a copy to theAdministrative Law Judge, as provided in andSection; 509.10. At all othertimes motions shall be addressed to the Board and filed with the Secretariat.In either case, a copy shall also be served on every other party to theproceeding. Motions shall be in writing, except that a motion made at asession of a hearing may be made orally on the record unless the AdministrativeLaw Judge directs that it be reduced to writing. All written motions shallstate with particularity the order or relief sought and the grounds therefor.(b) <T3>Responses.</T3> Within 15 days after service of any written motion,or within such other period of time as may be fixed by this part or byorder of the Administrative Law Judge, any party may file a written responseto such motion. The moving party shall have no right to reply to such responseexcept as expressly permitted by this part or by order of the AdministrativeLaw Judge. The Administrative Law Judge may waive the requirements of thissection as to motions for brief extensions of time and may rule upon suchmotions after receiving an oral response from the opposing party.(c) <T3>Dilatory motions not permitted.</T3> Repetitive or numerous motionsthat raise the same issues or arguments or deal with the same subject matteras previously-decided motions shall not be permitted. Such dilatory motionsmay form the basis for sanctions under andSection; 509.5(c) of this partor Part 513 of this subchapter. The Administrative Law Judge may assesscosts attendant to responding to or ruling on such motions against partieswho file such dilatory motions.(d) <T3>Supporting papers.</T3> Written memoranda or briefs may be filed withmotions or responses thereto, stating the points and authorities reliedupon in support of the position taken.(e) <T3>Oral argument.</T3> No oral argument will be heard on motions exceptas directed by the Administrative Law Judge.(f) <T3>Rulings on motions.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this part,the Administrative Law Judge shall rule promptly upon all motions properlyserved upon him and upon such other motions as the Board may direct, exceptthat if the Administrative Law Judge finds that a prompt decision by theBoard on a motion is essential to the proper conduct of the proceeding,he may refer such motion to the Board for decision. The original of allrulings and orders on motions by the Administrative Law Judge shall befiled by him with the Secretariat, and copies served by the AdministrativeLaw Judge on all parties to the proceeding.(g) <T3>Continuation of proceeding.</T3> Unless otherwise ordered by the AdministrativeLaw Judge or the Board, the proceeding, including the hearing, shall continuepending the determination of any motion that must be decided by the Board.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interlocutory review.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule.</T3> The Board will review a ruling of the AdministrativeLaw Judge prior to the submission of the Administrative Law Judge's recommendeddecision only in extraordinary circumstances that warrant the Board's promptreview and in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.(b) <T3>Scope of review.</T3> An interlocutory appeal may be permitted, inthe discretion of the Board, under the following circumstances:(1) Appeal from a ruling pursuant to andSection; 509.5 suspending an attorneyor other representative from participation in a particular proceeding;(2) Appeal from an order denying a motion for summary disposition;(3) On certification by the Administrative Law Judge in accordance withparagraph (c) of this section;(4) Upon any other interlocutory ruling where certification has been deniedby the Administrative Law Judge. Interlocutory review shall not be grantedunder this paragraph (b)(4) unless the Board determines that the AdministrativeLaw Judge's failure to certify the matter was clearly erroneous.(c) <T3>Certification by Administrative Law Judge.</T3> (1) Any party may movethat the Administrative Law Judge certify and permit an appeal of a contestedruling to the Board. Such a motion shall be served within 10 days of theAdministrative Law Judge's notification to the parties of the contestedruling; <T3>Provided, however,</T3> That if such a motion is made during the hearing,the Administrative Law Judge may permit the motion and responses theretoto be made orally. The motion for certification must state the groundsrelied upon, including the reasons for permitting the interlocutory review,in accordance with the criteria set forth in paragraph (c)(2) of this section.Any party may serve a response to a motion for certification within 10days after service of the motion.(2) The Administrative Law Judge shall certify a ruling for interlocutoryreview to the Board only upon a motion by a party and a determination bythe Administrative Law Judge that (i) the ruling involves a controllingquestion of law or policy as to which substantial grounds exist for a differenceof opinion and (ii) an immediate appeal from the ruling may materiallyadvance the ultimate conclusion of the proceeding. Any certification tothe Board shall be in writing and shall set forth the relevant issues,an explanation of the ruling on the issues, and specific reasons for thegranting of the moving party's request for review by the Board.(d) <T3>Procedure</T3>. Where certification is not required under paragraph(b) of this section of where the Administrative Law Judge certifies a rulingfor interlocutory review by the Board, or where a party believes that adenial of certification by the Administrative Law Judge was clearly erroneous,a petition for interlocutory review may be filed within 10 days after noticeof the Administrative Law Judge's ruling or certification. The petitionshall include or have attached thereto a copy of the ruling or portionthereof from which appeal is being sought and present the points of factand law relied upon in support of the position taken. Any party may servea response to a petition for interlocutory review within 10 days of serviceof the petition. The Board shall determine whether to grant interlocutoryreview based upon the petition for review and any responses thereto withoutoral argument or further written submissions unless the Board shall otherwisedirect.(e) <T3>Dismissal of interlocutory appeal by the Board</T3>. The Board maydismiss an interlocutory appeal if it finds that the Administrative LawJudge's certification was erroneously granted or if it finds that promptconsideration of the appeal is not warranted under the standards set forthabove in paragraph (c)(2) of this section.(f) <T3>Notification by the Secretariat</T3>. Neither a motion to the AdministrativeLaw Judge for interlocutory review, nor a petition to the Board for interlocutoryreview, nor the granting of such a motion or petition under this sectionshall suspend or stay the proceeding unless otherwise ordered by the AdministrativeLaw Judge or the Board. Any stay of longer than 30 days must be specificallyapproved by the Board.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prehearing conference and exchange of information.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prehearing conference</T3>. The Administrative Law Judge may, on hisown initiative or at the request of any party, direct counsel for all partiesto meet with him at a specified time and place prior to the hearing (inperson or by telephone) and/or submit prehearing memoranda to him in writing,to address any or all of the following:(1) Simplification and clarification of the issues;(2) Stipulations, admissions of fact, and the contents, authenticity andadmissibility into evidence of documents;(3) Matters of which official notice will be taken;(4) Limiting the number of witnesses; and(5) Such other matters as may aid in the orderly disposition of the proceeding.(b) <T3>Witnesses</T3>. Within a period of time established by the AdministrativeLaw Judge and prior to the date scheduled for the hearing, each party shallserve a written list of witnesses to be called to testify at the hearing.The list shall contain the name and address of each witness and a briefsummary of the testimony expected of each witness. The Administrative LawJudge shall not allow any witness to testify at the hearing who is notincluded on any party's witness list except for good cause shown.(c) <T3>Exhibits</T3>. Within a period of time established by the AdministrativeLaw Judge and prior to the date scheduled for hearing, each party shallserve a written list of exhibits to be offered into evidence at hearingtogether with a copy of each proposed exhibit. The Administrative Law Judgeshall not allow any exhibit to be accepted into evidence at the hearingthat is not listed and copied in accordance with the provisions of thisparagraph except for good cause shown.(d) <T3>Stipulations</T3>. Within a period of time established by the AdministrativeLaw Judge and prior to the date scheduled for the hearing, the partiesshall by written stipulation agree upon as many pertinent facts as practicable.The parties may also stipulate to any other pertinent facts orally at thehearing. When stipulations are accepted by the Administrative Law Judge,they shall be binding on the parties.(e) <T3>Prehearing brief</T3>. Any party may serve, and the AdministrativeLaw Judge may require all parties to serve, a prehearing brief or legalmemorandum in advance of the hearing date.(f) <T3>Prehearing order</T3>. At or within a reasonable time following theconclusion of a prehearing conference, the Administrative Law Judge shallfile with the Secretariat and serve upon each party a prehearing ordersetting forth agreements reached and any procedural determinations made.Any agreements reached among the parties at the prehearing conference orotherwise shall become part of the record and shall be binding on the partiesunless the Administrative Law Judge permits otherwise for good cause shown.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Opportunity for informal settlement.</ITAG>(a) Any respondent may at any time unilaterally submit to the Secretariat,for consideration by the Board of its designee, with copies to all otherparties, written offers or proposals for settlement of a proceeding, withoutprejudice to the rights of the parties. Other parties to the proceedingmay respond to the settlement offer within 20 days of service of such settlementoffer. Unless the Office of Enforcement recommends to the Board or itsdesignee that it accept the submitted settlement offer, submission of asettlement offer shall not provide a basis for adjourning or otherwisedelaying all or any portion of a proceeding under this subpart. No suchsettlement offer or proposal shall be admissible in evidence over the objectionof any party in any hearing in connection with such proceeding.(b) Upon receipt of a settlement offer, the Board, its designee, or anyperson selected by the Board or its designee may consult with the partiesabout the settlement offer by convening a settlement conference with theparties or by requiring the submission of such additional information asthe Board or such other person may deem, appropriate for considerationof the settlement offer.(c) The Board shall notify the parties of is decision whether to acceptthe settlement offer within 60 days of its receipt of such settlement offer,unless extended in writing for good cause.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discovery.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule</T3>. Parties to proceedings under this part may obtaindiscovery only through the production of documents and only by order ofthe Administrative Law Judge in accordance with the procedures set forthin this paragraph. Except as otherwise expressly authorized by this part,no other form of discovery shall be allowed.(b) <T3>Criteria</T3>. Discovery shall be permitted only upon a clear showingthat:(1) The documents being sought are relevant and material to the requestingparty's case or defense;(2) The party seeking discovery has substantial need for the materialsfor the preparation of its case or defense; and(3) The location and production of the documents will not result in anyundue burden to any other party or in any undue delay in the proceeding.(c) <T3>Procedure</T3>. Any party seeking to obtain discovery shall serve amotion for discovery containing facts and arguments sufficient to demonstratethat the criteria set forth in paragraphs (b) (1), (2), and (3) of thissection have been satisfied. The motion shall identify with reasonableparticularity the documents requested, either by individual item or bycategory. Any party may serve a response to the motion within 10 days ofservice thereof. Upon a clear showing that the criteria set forth in paragraphs(b) (1), (2), and (3) of this section have ben satisfied, the AdministrativeLaw Judge may grant all or such part of such discovery request as he maydeem appropriate under the circumstances.(d) <T3>Response</T3>. In the event that the Administrative Law Judge grantsall or part of a discovery request, the party from whom the documents wererequested shall furnish the documents within 20 days of service of thedecision of the Administrative Law Judge, unless the parties agree on adifferent time or the Administrative Law Judge orders a different timefor good cause shown. If any documents are withheld on the basis of privilegeof any kind as provided by paragraph (e) of this section, the respondingparty shall provide a written list of the documents withheld, the privilegeclaimed with respect to each document, and the basis for the claim of privilege.(e) <T3>Privileged documents</T3>. Privileged documents are not discoverable.Applicable privileges include the attorney-client privilege, the attorneywork product privilege, the governmental deliberative process privilege,and other such privileges as the United States Constitution, applicableacts of Congress, or principles of the common law may provide.(f) <T3>Motions to compel production</T3>. If any party fails to comply withan order of the Administrative Law Judge granting a discovery request withinthe prescribed time for response, or withholds documents without a validprivilege claim, the requesting party may move for an order of the AdministrativeLaw Judge compelling production of the documents. The Administrative LawJudge may impose sanctions under andSection; 509.5(c) for failure to complywith a discovery order.(g) <T3>Protective orders</T3>. Upon a showing that discovery is being conductedin bad faith or in such a manner as unreasonably to annoy, oppress, orembarrass any party, the Administrative Law Judge may order discovery terminatedor may limit the scope or manner of discovery. Grounds for terminatingor limiting discovery include persistent requests for privileged documents,repeated inquiries into areas that are neither relevant nor likely to leadto the discovery of relevant information, and unwarranted attempts to pryinto a party's preparation for trial.(h) <T3>Time limits</T3>. All discovery, including all responses to discoveryrequests, shall be completed at least 30 days prior to the date scheduledfor the commencement of the hearing. No exceptions to this rule shall bepermitted unless the Administrative Law Judge finds on the record thatgood cause clearly exists for waiving the requirements of this subsection.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas for documentary or physical evidence or for witness attendance.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Issuance</T3>. The Administrative Law Judge shall issue subpoenas,as authorized by law, at the request of any party, requiring the attendanceof witnesses at the hearing to be held in connection with an adjudicatoryproceeding and/or the production of documentary or physical evidence atsuch hearing. Where it appears to the Administrative Law Judge that thesubpoena may be unreasonable, oppressive, excessive in scope, or undulyburdensome, the party seeking the subpoena may be required, as a conditionprecedent to the issuance of the subpoena, to show the general relevanceand reasonable scope of the testimony or other evidence sought. In theevent the Administrative Law Judge, after consideration of all the circumstances,determines that the subpoena or any of its terms are unreasonable, oppressive,excessive in scope, or unduly burdensome, he may refuse to issue the subpoena,or may issue it in modified form upon such conditions as justice requires.(b) <T3>Motion to quash</T3>. Any person to whom a subpoena is directed may,prior to the time specified therein for compliance but in no event morethan 10 days after the date of service of such subpoena, serve a motion,in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 509.17 of this part, torevoke, quash, or modify such subpoena, accompanying such application witha statement of the reasons therefor.(c) <T3>Service of subpoena</T3>. The party seeking the subpoena is responsiblefor effecting service thereof. Service of a subpoena upon a person namedtherein shall be made by delivering a copy of the subpoena by personalservice, certified or registered mail, or an express delivery service tosuch person and by tendering the fees for one day's attendance and themileage as specified in paragraph (d) of this section, except that whena subpoena is issued at the instance of the Office of Enforcement, feesand mileage need not be tendered at the time of service of the subpoena.If service is made by a United States Marshall, his deputy, or an employeeof the Board, such service shall be evidenced by his return thereon. Ifmade by any other person, such person shall make affidavit thereto, describingthe manner in which service is made, and return such affidavit on or withthe original subpoena.(d) <T3>Attendance of witnesses</T3>. The attendance of witnesses and the productionof documents pursuant to a subpoena issued in connection with a hearingprovided for in this part may be required from any place in any State,Commonwealth, possession, territory, or the District of Columbia at anydesignated place where the hearing is being conducted. Witnesses subpoenaedin any proceeding under this part shall be paid the same fees and mileagethat are paid witnesses in the district courts of the United States.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Depositions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prerequisites</T3>. Oral depositions shall be permitted in adjudicatoryproceedings under this part only upon a showing that:(1) The proposed deponent is or is likely to be unavailable to attend thehearing because of age, illness, infirmity or other cause beyond the controlof the deponent;(2) The testimony of the proposed deponent will be relevant and materialto the proceeding; and(3) The taking of the deposition will not result in any undue burden toany other party or in undue delay in the proceeding.(b) <T3>Procedure</T3>. Any party desiring to take the oral deposition of awitness shall serve a written motion setting forth facts sufficient todemonstrate that the prerequisites set forth in paragraph (a) of this sectionhave been satisfied. The motion shall include the name and address of theproposed deponent and a statement setting forth the matters upon whichthe proposed deponent will be questioned, the materiality and relevanceof the deponent's testimony, the need for the deposition, and the proposedtime and place for the deposition. Any party may serve a response to themotion within 10 days after service thereof. Failure of a party to respondto such a motion within 10 days will be deemed to constitute a waiver ofobjection to the deposition. (c) <T3>Decision</T3>. Upon a showing that the prerequisites set forth in paragraph(a) of this section have been satisfied, the Administrative Law Judge may,by subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, order that such oral deposition betaken. If, after consideration of all circumstances, the AdministrativeLaw Judge determines that the deposition or its location, in whole or inpart, is unnecessary, unreasonable, oppressive, excessive in scope, orunduly burdensome, he may refuse to grant the motion or may grant it onlyupon such conditions as justice requires. The Administrative Law Judgeshall serve a notice of the action taken on the motion upon each of theparties. Service shall be accomplished under the procedures of andSection;509.9 of this part. Service shall be completed at least 10 days in advanceof the date and time fixed for the taking of the deposition.(d) <T3>Motion to quash</T3>. A person named in a subpoena or subpoena ducestecum to take evidence by oral deposition who is not a party to the proceedingmay move to revoke, quash, or modify the subpoena. Such motion shall beaccompanied by a statement of the reasons therefor and a copy of the motionshall be served upon the party requesting the subpoena. The motion mustbe made prior to the time for compliance specified in the subpoena andnot more than 10 days after the date of service of the subpoena, exceptfor good cause shown.(e) <T3>Procedure on deposition; objections</T3>. Each witness testifying uponoral deposition shall be duly sworn, and all other parties shall have theright to cross-examine. Objections to questions or evidence shall be inshort form, stating the grounds of objection, unless a valid privilegeis asserted. If the deponent refuses to answer a question posed at a deposition,the deposition may be adjourned or completed at the option of the partywho requested the deposition, except as to the unanswered question, andan oral or written request may be made to the Administrative Law Judgeto compel an answer.(f) <T3>Protective orders</T3>. At any time during the taking of a deposition,on motion of the deponent or of any party, and upon a showing that thedeposition is being conducted in bad faith or in such manner as unreasonablyto annoy, embarrass, or oppress the deponent or party, the AdministrativeLaw Judge may order the termination of the deposition or may limit thescope and manner of the taking of the deposition. Grounds for terminatingor limiting a deposition include persistent questioning on privileged matters,repeated inquiries into areas that are neither relevant nor likely to leadto the discovery of relevant information, or unwarranted attempts to pryinto a party's preparation for trial. The physical condition of the witnessand the adequacy of the examination that has already taken place also maybe considered.(g) <T3>Introduction as evidence</T3>. If the deposition or any portion ofthe deposition is offered at the hearing, the Administrative Law judgeshall then consider any objections raised, provided that those objectionswere made during the deposition and, at that time, may refuse to allowreading of the answer to any question found to be objectionable. Subjectto appropriate rulings on such objections to questions or evidence as werenoted at the time the deposition was taken or as would be valid were thewitness personally present and testifying, the deposition or any part thereofmay be submitted into evidence by any party to the proceeding. Only thatpart of a deposition that is received in evidence at a hearing shall constitutea part of the record in such proceeding upon which a decision may be based.(h)<T3>Payment of fees. </T3>The fees of the witness and of there porter shallbe paid by the person upon whose application the deposition was taken.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conduct of hearings.</ITAG>(a)<T3>Hearing rules. </T3>Every party shall have the right to present itscase or defense by oral and documentary evidence and to conduct such cross-examinationas may be required for full disclosure of the facts. Irrelevant, immaterial,or unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. Objections to the admissionor exclusion of evidence shall be concise and, together with rulings thereon,become part of the record. Argument on objections may, at the discretionof the Administrative Law Judge, take place off the record. Failure toobject to admission or exclusion of evidence or to any ruling shall constitutea waiver of the objection. The privileges of witnesses or parties shallbe governed by the principles of the common law as such principles maybe interpreted by the courts of the United States in light of reason andexperience. (b) <T3>Official notice. </T3>Official notice may be taken of any materialfact that might be judicially noticed by a district court of the UnitedStates and of any material information in the official public records ofthe Board. All matters officially noticed by the Administrative Law Judgeshall appear on the record. If official notice is requested or taken ofany fact, the parties, upon timely request, shall be afforded an opportunityto establish the contrary. (c) <T3>Transcript of testimony. </T3>Hearings shall be recorded and transcriptswill be made available to any party upon payment of the cost thereof. Acopy of the transcript of the testimony taken at the hearing, duly certifiedby the reporter, together with all exhibits, shall be filed with AdministrativeLaw Judge, who shall file such materials with the Secretariat at the timehe submits his recommended decision. The Administrative Law Judge shallhave the authority to rule upon motions to correct the record. (d) <T3>Continuances and changes or extensions of time and changes of placeof hearing. </T3>Prior to the appointment of an Administrative Law Judgeand after the filing of a recommended decision pursuant to andSection; 509.27of this part, except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the Boardmay in the notice or any subsequent order provide time limits differentfrom those specified in this part and may, on its own initiative or forgood cause shown, change or extend any time limit prescribed by these rulesor the notice, or change the time and place for any hearing hereunder.The Administrative Law Judge may, as permitted by law, change the timefor beginning any hearing, continue or adjourn a hearing from time to time,and change the location of the hearing. (e) <T3>Call for further evidence, oral arguments, briefs, or reopening ofhearing. </T3>The Administrative Law Judge may call for the productionof further evidence upon any issue, may permit oral argument and submissionof briefs at or following the hearing, and, upon appropriate notice, mayreopen the hearing at any time prior to the filing of his recommended decisionwith the Secretariat. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Private and public hearings.</ITAG>(a) All hearings shall be private and shall be attended only by the parties,their representatives or counsel, witnesses while testifying, and otherpersons having an official interest in the proceeding unless the Boarddetermines that a public hearing should be held pursuant to this section.Unless an exception is granted by the Administrative Law Judge in responseto a motion by a party, all witnesses shall be sequestered.(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the Board as provided in paragraph (c)of this section or required by law, the entire record in any proceedingunder this part, including, but not limited to, the notice, answer, thetranscript, exhibits, proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law,briefs, recommended decision of the Administrative Law Judge, exceptionsthereto, the decision and order of the Board, and any other papers anddocuments that are filed in connection with the proceeding shall not bemade public, and shall be for the confidential use only of the Board andits staff, the Administrative Law Judge, the parties, and appropriate supervisoryauthorities.(c) Where the Board, in its discretion, after fully considering the viewsof the party afforded the hearing, determines that a public hearing isnecessary to protect the public interest, the Board may order that thehearing be public. In any public hearing, the Administrative Law Judgeshall have the authority to take all appropriate steps, including closingportions of the hearing to the public and admitting materials into therecord under seal, to protect the reputation and integrity of any nonpartiesto the proceeding. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Summary disposition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Filing of motions and responses. </T3>Any party who believes that thereis no genuine issue of material fact to be determined and that he is entitledto a decision as a matter of law may move for summary disposition in hisfavor of all or any part of the proceeding. Such motion may be filed atany time. Any party, within 20 days after service of such a motion, orwithin such further time period as the Administrative Law Judge may allow,may serve an opposition to such motion and/or may countermove for summarydisposition. Following receipt of a motion for summary disposition andall responses thereto and any further written submission and/or oral argumenthe deems appropriate, the Administrative Law Judge shall submit a recommendeddecision to the Board in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 509.27(c)and of paragraph (d) of this section if he finds that summary dispositionis warranted. No such recommended decision need be filed with the Boardif the Administrative Law Judge finds that no party is entitled to summarydisposition. If the Administrative Law Judge determines that a party isentitled to summary disposition as to certain claims only, he may defersubmitting a recommended decision as to those claims until he files hisrecommended decision at the conclusion of the hearing. If the AdministrativeLaw Judge determines that a party is entitled to an order based on thepresence in one or more transaction(s) or occurrence(s) of all statutoryelements necessary to support such an order, he may recommend that theBoard issue such an order based on such transaction or occurrence eventhough he may make no such finding with respect to other transactions oroccurrences contained in the notice. (b) <T3>Supporting papers. </T3>A motion for summary disposition shall be accompaniedby a statement of the material facts as to which the moving party contendsthere is no genuine issue, supported by documentary evidence, admissionsin pleadings, stipulations, depositions, and any other evidentiary materialsthat the moving party contends support his position. The motion shall alsobe accompanied by a brief containing the points and authorities in supportof the contention of the party making the motion. Any party opposing amotion for summary disposition shall file a statement setting forth thosematerial facts as to which he contends a genuine dispute exists, supportedby evidence of the same type required to be submitted with the motion forsummary disposition and a brief containing the points and authorities insupport of the contention that summary disposition would be inappropriate.A party opposing a motion for summary disposition may argue that, althoughthere is no dispute as to the material facts, the law is unclear or contraryto the position urged by the moving party or that the circumstances aresuch that a different remedy or result is appropriate. In this event, theparty's submission shall clearly set forth such legal differences or circumstancesand a discussion of the appropriate result or remedy. (c) <T3>Hearing on motion. </T3>At the request of any party or <T3>sua sponte, </T3>the Administrative Law Judge may convene a hearingon any motion for summary disposition for the purpose of receiving oralargument on the motion. (d) <T3>Recommended decision on motion. </T3>The Administrative Law Judge shallrecommend that the Board issue a final order granting a motion for summarydisposition if the undisputed pleaded facts, admissions, stipulations,documentary evidence, deposition transcripts, matters as to which officialnotice may be taken, and any other evidentiary materials properly submittedin connection with the motion show that: (1) There is no genuine issueas to any material fact; (2) there is no necessity that further facts bedeveloped on the record; and (3) the moving party is entitled to a decisionin his favor as a matter of law. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and recommeded decision.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law.</T3> Each party shallhave a period of 30 days after the submission of the hearing transcriptto the Administrative Law Judge following the close of the hearing, orsuch further time as the Administrative Law Judge for good cause may allow,to serve proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law, which may beaccompanied by a brief in support thereof. Such proposals shall be supportedby citation of such statutes, decisions and other authorities, and pagereferences to such portions of the record as may be relevant. Each partymay serve a reply brief within 20 days of service of the other parties'proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law and accompanying briefs.All such proposals and briefs shall become a part of the record.(b) <T3>Recommended decision and filing of record.</T3> The AdministrativeLaw Judge shall, within 30 days after the expiration of the time allowedunder paragraph (a) of this section, or within such further time as theBoard for good cause may allow, file with the Secretariat and certify tothe Board for decision the entire record of the hearing, which shall includehis recommended decision in accordance with section 557 of Title 5 of theUnited States Code, the transcript, and the exhibits (including, on requestof any of the parties, any exhibits excluded from evidence or tenders ofproof), exceptions, rulings, and all pleadings, briefs, and other materialsfiled in connection with the hearing. Promptly upon such filing, the Secretariatshall serve upon each party to the proceeding a copy of the recommendeddecision. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply in any casewhere the hearing was held before the Board.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Briefs.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Contents.</T3> All briefs shall be confined to the particular mattersin issue. Each proposed finding of fact, conclusion of law, or exceptionthat is briefed shall be supported by a concise argument and by citationof such statutes, decisions, and other authorities and by page referencesto such portions of the record as may be relevant. If the exception relatesto the admission or exclusion of evidence, the substance of the evidenceadmitted or excluded shall be set forth in the brief with appropriate referencesto the transcript.(b) <T3>Reply briefs.</T3> Reply briefs may be served within 20 days afterservice of original briefs of opposing parties, or such further time asthe Administrative Law Judge may permit, and shall be confined to mattersin opening briefs. Further briefs may be filed only with the express permissionof the Administrative Law Judge.(c) <T3>Delayed filing.</T3> Briefs not served on or before the time fixedin this part will be received only upon special permission of the AdministrativeLaw Judge.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exceptions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Filing.</T3> Within 30 days after service of the recommended decisionof the Administrative Law Judge or such further time as the Board for goodcause shall allow, any party (other than a party who has not filed an answerin accordance with andSection; 509.14(a)), may serve and file with the Secretariatexceptions thereto or to any portion thereof, or the failure of the AdministrativeLaw Judge to make any recommendation, finding, or conclusion, or to theadmission or exclusion of evidence, or to any other ruling of the AdministrativeLaw Judge supported by such brief as may appear advisable.(b) <T3>Waiver.</T3> Failure of a party to serve and file exceptions to therecommended decision of the Administrative Law Judge or any portion thereof,or to his failure to adopt a proposed finding or conclusion, or to theadmission or exclusion of evidence, or to any other ruling of the AdministrativeLaw Judge within the time allowed under paragraph (a) of this section,shall be deemed to be a waiver of objection thereto.(c) <T3>Review by the Board on its own initiative.</T3> The Board may, on itsown initiative, undertake review of a recommended decision of an AdministrativeLaw Judge within 30 days after the recommeded decision has been servedon all parties. Notice of any order of the Board directing review on itsown initiative shall be served on all parties by the Secretariat.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Oral argument before the Board.</ITAG>Upon the Board's own initiative or upon the written request of any partymade within the time for filing exceptions to the recommeded decision (orany part thereof) of the Administrative Law Judge, the Board or its designee(s)may order and hear oral argument on all or any part of the recommendeddecision and the findings and conclusions on which the recommended decisionor such part thereof is based. Such written request must show good causefor oral argument, including reasons why arguments have not been or cannotbe, presented adequately in writing. Oral argument before the Board shallbe recorded by the Secretariat.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of submission to the Board.</ITAG>Upon the filing of the record with the Secretariat, and upon the expirationof the time for the filing of exceptions and all briefs, including replybriefs or any further briefs permitted by the Board, and upon the hearingof any oral argument ordered by the Board, the Secretariat shall notifythe parties in writing that the case has been sumbitted to the Board forfinal decision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Decision of the Board.</ITAG>(a) Employees of the Board who have not engaged in any way in the performanceof investigatory or adjudicatory functions in connection with a proceedingmay advise and assist the Board in the consideration of the proceeding.The Board shall consider the recommeded decision and the whole record onreview and shall base its determination thereon.(b) The Board shall render its final decision within 90 days after theSecretariat has notified the parties, pursuant to andSection; 509.31 of thispart, that the case has been submitted to the Board for final decision,unless within such 90-day period the Board shall order that such noticebe set aside and the case reopened for further proceedings. Copies of thedecision and order of the Board shall be served by the Secretariat uponeach party to the proceeding and, if directed by the Board or requiredby statute, upon any appropriate State supervisory authority.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Assessment of Civil Money Penalties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.33 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>The rules and procedures in this Subpart and in subpart A shall apply toproceedings under section 407(k)(3) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730(k)(3), section408(j)(4)(C) of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(j)(4)(C), and section 5(d)(8)(B)of the HOLA, 12 U.S.C. 1464(d)(8)(B), to determine whether and/or to whatextent civil penalties should be assessed against insured institutions,their affiliates, service corporations, savings and loan holding companies,subsidiaries thereof, and/or related officials in violation of any orderissued under the Board's cease-and-desist authority or any provision ofsection 408 of the NHA, 12 U.S.C. 1730a <T3>et seq.</T3> or any regulation (see Parts 583 and 584 of this SubchapterF of this chapter) or order issued pursuant thereto.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.34 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of assessment; request for hearing; answer.</ITAG>Proceedings to assess civil money penalties shall be commenced by serviceof a notice of assessment of civil money penalty. The notice shall containa statement of the facts constituting the grounds for the assessment ofthe penalty, the amount of the civil money penalty being assessed, andthe date by which the penalty must be paid and shall inform the party beingassessed of its right to request a hearing to challenge the assessmentof the penalty within 10 days of service of the notice. If a hearing isnot requested within the prescribed 10 day period, the assessment shallconstitute a final and unappealable order of the Board. A party requestinga hearing shall file an answer as prescribed in andSection; 509.14.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of hearing.</ITAG>A party requesting a hearing shall be informed by notice of the time andplace set for the hearing. The notice of hearing shall be served at least30 days in advance of the date set for the hearing and shall order thehearing to commence within 60 days after receipt of the request for a hearing.Any party afforded a hearing who does not appear at the hearing personallyor through a duly authorized representative shall be deemed to have consentedto the issuance of an assessment order.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.36 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessment orders.</ITAG>In the event of consent, or if upon the record developed at the hearing,the Board finds that any of the grounds specified in the notice of assessmenthas been established, the Board may serve an order of assessment of civilmoney penalty upon the party concerned. An assessment order shall be effectiveimmediately upon service or upon such other date as may be specified thereinand shall remain effective and enforceable until it is stayed, modified,terminated, or set aside by the Board or by a reviewing court.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.37 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment of civil penalty.</ITAG>(a) Civil penalties assessed pursuant to this Subpart B are payable andto be collected within 60 days after the issuance of the notice of assessment,unless the Board fixes a different time for payment where it determinesthat the purpose of the penalty would be better served thereby: <T3>Provided, however,</T3> That if a party has made a timely request fora hearing to challenge the assessment of the penalty, the party shall notbe required to pay such penalty until the Board has issued a final orderof assessment following the hearing. In such cases, the penalty shall bepaid within 60 days of service of such order unless the Board fixes a differenttime for payment.(b) Checks in payment of civil penalties shall be made payable to the Treasurerof the United States and sent to the Controller's Division of the Board.Upon receipt, the Board shall forward the check to the Treasury of theUnited States.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 509.38 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relevant considerations.</ITAG>In determining the amount of the penalty to be assessed in any proceedingunder this part, the Board shall consider the financial strength and goodfaith of the party against whom the penalty is to be assessed, the gravityof the violation, any previous violations, and such other matter as justicemay require.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 512_RULES FOR INVESTIGATIVE PROCEEDINGS AND FORMAL EXAMINATIONPROCEEDINGS</ITAG>2. The authority citation for Part 512 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1437);sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464); secs. 402, 407, 48 Stat.1256, 1260, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1725, 1730); sec. 408, 82 Stat. 5, asamended (12 U.S.C. 1730a); sec. 12, 48 Stat. 892, as amended (15 U.S.C.78<T3>l</T3>); Reorg. Plan. No. 3 of 1947; 3 CFR 1943-1948 Comp.</ITAG>3. Section 512.1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of part.</ITAG>This part prescribes rules of practice and procedure applicable to theconduct of investigative proceedings under section 408(h)(2) of the NationalHousing Act, as amended, 12 U.S.C. 1730a(h)(2) (``Act'') and to the conductof formal examination proceedings with respect to insured institutionsand their affiliates under section 407 (m)(2) or (q)(16) of the Act, asamended, 12 U.S.C. 1730 (m)(2) or (q)(16). This part does not apply toadjudicatory proceedings as to which hearings are required by statute,the rules for which are contained in Part 509 of this subchapter.4. Section 512.2(c) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) ``Formal examination proceeding'' means the administration of oathsand affirmations, taking and preserving of testimony, requiring the productionof books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and all other records, theissuance of subpoenas, and all related activities in connection with examinationof insured institutions and their affiliates conducted pursuant to section407 (m)(2) or (q)(16) of the Act; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. Section 512.3 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Confidentiality of proceedings.</ITAG>All formal examination proceedings shall be private and, unless otherwiseordered by the Board, all investigative proceedings shall also be private.Unless otherwise ordered or permitted by the Board, or required by law,and except as provided in andSection;andSection; 512.4 and 512.5, the entirerecord of any investigative proceeding or formal examination proceeding,including the resolution of the Board or its delegate(s) authorizing theproceeding, the transcript of such proceeding, and all documents and informationobtained by the designated representative(s) during the course of saidproceedings shall be confidential.6. Section 512.4 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transcripts.</ITAG>Transcripts or other recordings, if any, of investigative proceedings orformal examination proceedings shall be prepared solely by an officialreporter or by any other person or means authorized by the designated representative.A person who has submitted documentary evidence or given testimony in aninvestigative proceeding or formal examination proceeding may procure acopy of his own documentary evidence or transcript of his own testimonyupon payment of the cost thereof; <T3>Provided,</T3> That a person seeking a transcript of his own testimonymust file a written request with the Director or any Deputy Director ofthe Office of Enforcement stating the reason he desires to procure suchtranscript, and said persons may for good cause deny such request. In anyevent, any witness (or his counsel) shall have the right to inspect thetranscript of the witness' own testimony.7. Sections 512.5(b)(1) and (b)(2) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rights of witnesses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(1) Such attorney shall be a member in good standing of the bar of thehighest court of any State, Commonwealth, possession, territory, or theDistrict of Columbia, who has not been suspended or debarred from practiceby the bar of any such political entity or before the Board in accordancewith the provisions of Part 513 of this subchapter and has not been excludedfrom the particular investigative proceeding or formal examination proceedingin accordance with paragraph (b)(3) of this section.(2) Such attorney may advise the witness before, during, and after thetaking of his testimony and may briefly question the witness, on the record,at the conclusion of his testimony, for the sole purpose of clarifyingany of the answers the witness has given. During the taking of the testimonyof a witness, such attorney may make summary notes solely for his use inrepresenting his client. All witnesses shall be sequestered, and, unlesspermitted in the discretion of the designated representative, no witnessor accompanying attorney may be permitted to be present during the takingof testimony of any other witness called in such proceeding. Neither attorney(s)for the institution(s) that are the subjects of the investigative proceedingsor formal examination proceedings, nor attorneys for any other interestedpersons, shall have any right to be present during the testimony of anywitness not personally being represented by such attorney.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>8. Section 512.5 is amended by removing paragraph (c).9. Section 512.7 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 512.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subpoenas.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Service.</T3> Service of a subpoena in connection with any investigativeproceeding or formal examination proceeding shall be effected in the followingmanner:(1) <T3>Service upon a natural person.</T3> Service of a subpoena upon a naturalperson may be affected by handing it to such person; by leaving it at hisoffice with the person in charge thereof, or, if there is no one in charge,by leaving it in a conspicuous place therein; by leaving it at his dwellingplace or usual place of abode with some person of suitable age and discretionthen residing therein; by mailing it to him by registered or certifiedmail or by an express delivery service at his last known address; or byany method whereby actual notice is given to him.(2) <T3>Service upon other persons.</T3> When the person to be served is nota natural person, service of the subpoena may be effected by handing thesubpoena to a registered agent for service, or to any officer, director,or agent in charge of any office of such person; by mailing it to any suchrepresentative by registered or certified mail or by an express deliveryservice at his last known address; or by any method whereby actual noticeis given to such person.(b) <T3>Motions to quash.</T3> Any person to whom a subpoena is directed may,prior to the time specified therein for compliance, but in no event morethan 10 days after the date of service of such subpoena, apply to the Directoror any Deputy Director of the Office of Enforcement to quash or modifysuch subpoena, accompanying such application with a statement of the reasonstherefor. The Director or the Deputy Director, as appropriate, may: (1)Deny the application; (2) quash or revoke the subpoena; (3) modify thesubpoena; or (4) condition the granting of the application on such termsas the Director or Deputy Director determines to be just, reasonable, andproper.(c) <T3>Attendance of witnesses.</T3> Subpoenas issued in connection with aninvestigative proceeding or formal examination proceeding may require theattendance and/or testimony of witnesses from any State or territory ofthe United States and the production by such witnesses of documentary orother tangible evidence at any designated place where the proceeding isbeing (or is to be) conducted. Foreign nationals are subject to such subpoenasif such service is made upon a duly authorized agent located in the UnitedStates.(d) <T3>Witness fees and mileage.</T3> Witnesses summoned in any proceedingunder this part shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnessesin the district courts of the United States.<ITAG tagnum="21">By the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John F. Ghizzoni,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-14821 Filed 6-22-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6720-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>